[1]         
This seven-week trial regarding the parties’ now 11-year-old child
is the latest chapter in an exceptionally high-conflict case where the parties
have engaged in constant litigation, starting when the child was an infant, and
spanning two continents.
[2]         
The applicant mother fled with the child from her home country,
Peru, in the face of ongoing litigation in Peru involving parenting issues, and
arrived in Canada in early November 2019, claiming that she was fearful for the
lives of herself and the child because of the father’s conduct.  The respondent
father followed the mother to Canada, specifically to London, Ontario where the
mother and child were residing, and where both parties continued to reside at
the time of trial.
[3]         
The father commenced an application pursuant to the Hague
Convention[1]
(“Hague application”) seeking the return of the child to Peru.  The Hague
application was dismissed.  The respondent father appealed to the Court of
Appeal for Ontario and his appeal was dismissed (“Hague appeal
decision”).
[4]         
This current trial required the court to consider a parenting
plan for the child.  This was acknowledged by the Court of Appeal for Ontario
in its reasons.
[5]         
The most significant issue in this trial relates to the parenting
order that is in the child’s best interests.  The other main issues relate to
the applicant mother’s claims for child support, a restraining order and an
order pursuant to s. 140 of the Courts of Justice Act, R.S.O. 1990, c.
C.43, (“vexatious proceedings”) prohibiting the respondent father from
instituting any proceedings except by leave of a judge of the Superior Court of
Justice.
[6]         
For reasons that follow the order below includes that the
applicant mother shall have sole decision-making responsibility for the child;
the child is to reside with the mother; the respondent father has no parenting
time with the child subject to the procedure and conditions specified in the
order where parenting time could be arranged; father is ordered to pay child
support; a final restraining order is granted; and the mother’s claim for an
order pursuant to s. 140 of the Courts of Justice Act is granted.
[7]         
For convenience a table of contents is appended to these reasons
for judgment as a schedule.
[8]         
During this trial the applicant mother requested to be addressed
as Ms. Izquierdo and the respondent father requested to be addressed as Mr.
Berendson.  Accordingly, in the balance of these reasons, the parties are
addressed as requested, and at times are referred to as the applicant and the
respondent.
[9]         
Both parties were born and raised in Peru.  Mr. Berendson also is
a German citizen and has both German and Peruvian passports.  The parties’
relevant employment histories are dealt with later in these reasons.
[10]      The
parties were married August 3, 2012 in Peru.  They separated in or about the latter
part of 2013 or early 2014.  The parties have one child, a son, M, born in
February 2013 (“the child”).  The parties’ marriage was annulled in Peru.
[11]      Ms.
Izquierdo has three other children who are now adults: her son, H, her
daughter, J, and her son, D, who were born, respectively, in 1993, 1996 and 2001. 
Mr. Sandoval is the father of H and J and Mr. Ruben Mimbela (“Mr. Mimbela”),
who testified at trial for Mr. Berendson, is D’s father.  Mr. Berendson has no
other children.
[12]      At
the time of trial, Ms. Izquierdo was age 53 and Mr. Berendson was age 56.
[13]      Shortly
after Ms. Izquierdo and the child left Peru, they arrived in Canada on or about
November 4, 2019, and they made a claim for refugee status.  Ms. Izquierdo’s
partner with whom she had been residing in Lima, Peru, also came to Canada. 
Ms. Izquierdo, the child and Ms. Izquierdo’s partner have continued to reside
together in London, Ontario.
[14]      A
decision of the Immigration and Refugee Board of Canada states that in relation
to Ms. Izquierdo, the child and Ms. Izquierdo’s partner, that their claims for
refugee protection were heard on October 27, 2022, and that the Refugee
Protection Division determined that the “claimants are Convention refugees and
therefore accepts the claims.”[2]
[15]      Ms.
Izquierdo testified that she and the child have permanent resident status in
Canada.
[16]      Mr.
Berendson arrived in Canada in or about July 2020 at the height of the Covid
pandemic.  He has been residing in London, Ontario since shortly after his
arrival in Canada.  Mr. Berendson has made application for refugee status;
further details regarding same are discussed later in these reasons.
[17]      It
is Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that she fled Peru with the child as a result of
her fears for the lives and safety of herself and the child because of Mr.
Berendson’s history of family violence.  Mr. Berendson has an entirely
different narrative.  His evidence is that he is the victim of a child
abduction perpetuated by Ms. Izquierdo and others; that he is a loving father
who has been deprived of having a relationship with the child; that he seeks to
be reunited with the child so that he can continue the loving father-son
relationship that they had in Peru.  Mr. Berendson either does not acknowledge,
or denies, engaging in any conduct constituting family violence.
[18]      As
discussed in more detail later, the child has no ongoing relationship or any
contact with Mr. Berendson.
[19]      The
issue that occupied most of the trial related to the parenting order that is in
the child’s best interests.  The substantial evidence at trial in relation to
the parenting issues included a not insignificant volume of evidence directed
at the allegations of family violence perpetrated by Mr. Berendson.
[20]      For
his part, Mr. Berendson during his testimony accused Ms. Izquierdo’s son, H, of
perpetrating violence against Mr. Berendson.  In addition, Mr. Berendson’s
witness, Mr. Mimbela, testified and accused Ms. Izquierdo of violent behaviour
towards Mr. Mimbela.  These allegations are discussed in more detail later in
these reasons. Findings are made rejecting both Mr. Berendson’s and Mr.
Mimbela’s accusations.
[21]      In
relation to the parenting issues, Mr. Berendson raised the applicability of s.
41 of the Children’s Law Reform Act, R.S.O. 1990, c C.12, (sometimes
referred to as the “CLRA”).  He claimed that the courts in Peru retain
jurisdiction in dealing with parenting issues, and Mr. Berendson claimed that
the existing parenting orders made in Peru should be enforced.  The issue in
relation to s. 41 raised by Mr. Berendson is fraught with inconsistencies. 
That issue is dealt with separately in these reasons.
[22]      The
remaining main issues include Ms. Izquierdo’s claims for child support, an
order pursuant to s. 140 of the Courts of Justice Act and a restraining
order.  Those issues are also dealt with separately in these reasons.
[23]      The
remaining issue relates to an order made by the court during the trial prohibiting
access to the digital audio recordings of this trial.  That order allowed the
parties to make submissions as to whether the order should continue after the
conclusion of the trial.  This issue is briefly dealt with separately in these
reasons.
[24]      At
the outset of the trial, Ms. Izquierdo[3],
Mr. Berendson[4]
and the Office of the Children’s Lawyer (“OCL”)[5]
each filed a proposed draft order dealing with the issues in this trial.  In
their written closing submissions and during oral closing argument, there was
some expansion as to the relief sought in the various draft orders.
[25]      In
relation to the parenting order, Ms. Izquierdo seeks sole decision-making
responsibility for the child and a continuation of the primary care of the
child.  Ms. Izquierdo seeks an order that Mr. Berendson have no parenting time
with the child, except on the child’s initiative and consent, and on a
supervised basis.
[26]      In
addition, in relation to parenting, Ms. Izquierdo requests orders as follows:
that she retains control over the child’s personal identity documents,
including the right to apply for or renew government-issued documents without
Mr. Berendson’s approval or consent; an order permitting Ms. Izquierdo to
change the child’s principal place of residence without Mr. Berendson’s
authorization; an order permitting travel anywhere with the child without Mr.
Berendson’s authorization; and an order that Mr. Berendson have no access to
any information regarding the child including information from third-party
service providers except as the child may choose and with the child’s prior
written consent.
[27]      Ms.
Izquierdo seeks a wide-ranging order prohibiting Mr. Berendson from publicizing
the child in any manner including on social media.
[28]      Regarding
child support, Ms. Izquierdo seeks an order of child support based on
imputation of income to Mr. Berendson.
[29]      Ms.
Izquierdo also seeks a restraining order against Mr. Berendson, that includes
non-communication in relation to Ms. Izquierdo, her partner and the child,
except as permitted in a parenting order.
[30]      Regarding
s. 140 of the Courts of Justice Act, Ms. Izquierdo seeks an order
prohibiting Mr. Berendson from commencing further “applications and/or motions”
except as may be permitted by the court.
[31]      Regarding
the issue of access to the digital audio recordings of this trial, Ms.
Izquierdo supports an order prohibiting access to those recordings.
[32]      In
his draft order, Mr. Berendson seeks: immediate restoration of his parenting
time with the child; an order that the courts in Peru have jurisdiction over
this case; and that the restraining order made against Mr. Berendson in this
court be terminated.
[33]      Further,
Mr. Berendson opposes the claim for child support and he opposes the claim
against him for an order pursuant to s. 140 of the Courts of Justice Act.
[34]      Mr.
Berendson did not articulate clearly a position concerning access to the
digital audio recordings of the trial.
[35]      The
OCL’s written closing argument as to the orders was more detailed than in the
draft order.  The OCL seeks an order as follows:
[36]      The
OCL supports an order prohibiting access to the digital audio recordings of the
trial and an order against Mr. Berendson pursuant to s. 140 of the Courts of
Justice Act.
[37]      In
March 2020, Mr. Berendson commenced his Hague application.  This application
proceeded to a trial and a decision was released June 21, 2021.[6]
[38]      The
reasons for judgment framed the various issues and the conclusions.[7] 
For the purpose of the current trial, most relevant were the conclusions that
the child’s habitual residence immediately before removal was Peru; that the
child was wrongfully removed from Peru because the father had custody rights in
Peru that were being exercised; and that there is a grave risk that the child’s
return to Peru would expose him to physical or psychological harm or otherwise
place the child in an intolerable situation.
[39]      As
noted earlier, Mr. Berendson’s Hague application for the return of the
child was dismissed.
[40]      It
is apparent from the comprehensive reasons for judgment, comprising 84 pages,
that Mr. Berendson’s behaviour and conduct towards Ms. Izquierdo and her family
was a significant issue during the trial of the Hague application.  A
number of allegations made against Mr. Berendson during the trial of the Hague
application were repeated by witnesses in the present trial and formed part of
the evidentiary record.
[41]      In
the Hague application, the refusal to return the child was based on
article 13(b) of the Hague Convention[8]:
[42]       While
there was evidence that was common to both the Hague application and the
present trial, the focus of each proceeding differed substantially.  The Hague
application was governed by the principles set out in the Hague Convention
and the jurisprudence applying those principles, and did not involve a
determination of the child’s best interests which is the focus of the current
trial in relation to the parenting order.
[43]      Mr.
Berendson was ordered to pay $50,000 in costs regarding the Hague
application.[9] 
Those costs remain unpaid.
[44]      Mr.
Berendson commenced an application in January 2022.  He sought various relief
pursuant to the Hague Convention.  This application was commenced after
the judgment was rendered in the first Hague application, but prior to
the hearing of the appeal.
[45]      A
motion was brought by Ms. Izquierdo to dismiss the second Hague
application.  On August 2, 2022, the court dismissed Mr. Berendson’s second Hague
application, describing it as an abuse of process[10]
and an attempt to re-litigate the initial Hague application.[11]
[46]      The
court awarded costs to Mr. Izquierdo in the amount of $5,000.[12] 
Those costs have not been paid.
[47]      On
August 12, 2022, the Court of Appeal for Ontario dismissed Mr. Berendson’s appeal[13]
from the judgment dated June 21, 2021, that dismissed the Hague
application.
[48]      The
Hague appeal decision included important guidance and direction to this
court in relation to the current trial.  At paragraph 5 the court states:
[49]      The
court stated further that as a result of the application judge’s decision, that
Ontario is now exercising jurisdiction to conduct an application by Ms.
Izquierdo for a parenting order: para. 13.
[50]      The
court acknowledged at para. 38 the applicability of article 16 of the Hague
Convention which states that the court of the requested state shall not
decide the merits of custody until there is a determination that the child will
not be returned.  The court added that is where the family is now; that the
parenting of the child remains to be determined.
[51]      The
court emphasized in para. 39: “… that the merits of the parenting proceeding
should be considered with a fresh approach.”  In making that statement, the
court identified gaps in the Hague application judge’s analysis[14]
and court discussed its concerns more specifically in paras.41-49.  At para.
50, the court reiterated its directive that the current parenting application
requires a fresh approach:
[52]      The
court’s directives to appoint a case management judge and to appoint the OCL
were implemented promptly.
[53]      The
court at para. 54 stated: “… I would order an expediated assessment pursuant to
s. 30 of the CLRA …”.  Despite this order, no s. 30 assessment was
conducted.  The failure to comply with this order is addressed later in these
reasons.
[54]      These
reasons for judgment are guided by the directive from the Court of Appeal for
Ontario to approach the parenting application afresh.
[55]      Both
parties testified and each party’s evidence spanned many days.  In addition,
Ms. Izquierdo testified briefly in reply.  Ms. Izquierdo testified in Spanish
and Mr. Berendson testified in English except for some very brief and concise
evidence that Mr. Berendson elected to give in Spanish.
[56]      As
the applicant, Ms. Izquierdo had a number of witnesses planned but in order to
shorten the trial Ms. Izquierdo put in her case through her testimony and also
through the testimony of her daughter, J.  Ms. Izquierdo removed her two sons,
H and D, from her planned witness list with the proviso that she would call
those witnesses, if necessary, in reply, which is what occurred.
[57]      All
of Ms. Izquierdo’s witnesses testified in Spanish.  H and D testified in-person
and J testified remotely from Lima, Peru.  When being cross-examined by Mr. Berendson,
both Ms. Izquierdo and H requested accommodations so that they did not have to
look directly at Mr. Berendson while he was questioning them.  The court
directed the use of a one-way screen which prevented the witness from seeing
Mr. Berendson, but which allowed Mr. Berendson to see the witness.
[58]      The
OCL’s case followed the presentation of Ms. Izquierdo’s case.  The OCL called
one witness who was the clinician assisting OCL counsel.  The clinician
testified remotely.
[59]      The
testimony of Ms. Izquierdo’s witnesses and the OCL witness is discussed later
in these reasons.
[60]      Mr.
Berendson also removed a number of witnesses from his planned witness list. 
Mr. Berendson called five witnesses.  One of those witnesses as noted earlier was
Mr. Mimbela and his evidence is dealt with later in these reasons.
[61]      Two
of the Mr. Berendson’s witnesses, Mr. David Jansen (“Mr. Jansen”) and Ms. Cindy
Hoy (“Ms. Hoy”) fell into the category of character witnesses.  They both
testified in English and in-person.  Mr. Jansen met Mr. Berendson following Mr.
Berendson’s arrival in Canada and has known Mr. Berendson for about three
years.  While Mr. Jansen spoke positively of his relationship with Mr.
Berendson, and his observations of Mr. Berendson’s interactions with others
including children, I find that Mr. Jansen’s evidence is not helpful in
deciding the issues in this case.  Mr. Jansen has never met the child.
[62]      Ms.
Hoy met Mr. Berendson two-and-a-half years ago.  Her testimony described Mr.
Berendson in very favourable terms; he is regarded as part of her family and
has a good relationship with her children.  Ms. Hoy described in positive terms
the activities that Mr. Berendson engaged in with her children.
[63]      Ms.
Hoy has not met the child.  I assess her evidence as being of marginal
relevance and of little assistance.
[64]      Mr.
Lennon Godversen (“Mr. Godversen”) testified remotely and in English from Lima,
Peru.  Mr. Godversen gave brief evidence regarding his observations of the
positive interaction between the child and Mr. Berendson at a Father’s Day
event in 2019 in Peru.  Mr. Godversen acknowledged that he first met Mr.
Berendson on that occasion.  While I take Mr. Godversen’s evidence into
account, it is limited only to one observation of Mr. Berendson and the child.
[65]      Ms.
Wendy Cotlear Leon testified remotely from Guelph, Ontario and in Spanish.  She
has been in Canada for 21 years.  She attended university in Peru.  Much of
this witness’ evidence was neither helpful nor probative with the exception of
the witness’ observations of Mr. Berendson and the child.  This witness
testified that she travels to Peru and recalled seeing Mr. Berendson and the
child at the beach.  Her evidence suggested that she travels to Peru annually. 
It was not clear from this witness’ evidence how many times she saw Mr.
Berendson together with the child and if she saw them each year that she
visited Peru.  When the witness did observe Mr. Berendson and the child it was
not a planned meeting but rather a casual encounter occurring for example when
she went for a walk on the beach.  I do accept this witness’ evidence that she
observed Mr. Berendson playing with the child in a creative way and that the
child was laughing.  The witness never observed any interaction between Mr.
Berendson and the child that raised any concerns.  I conclude that this witness
observed positive interactions between Mr. Berendson and the child in Peru, but
that the witness’ observations were not frequent.
[66]      Ms.
Izquierdo testified in a straight-forward manner, including during
cross-examination.  While at times Ms. Izquierdo was non-responsive to the
question posed, or attempted to provide unnecessary detail, I find overall that
that did not impact Ms. Izquierdo’s credibility and reliability.
[67]      I
find that Ms. Izquierdo was an honest witness, doing her best to explain to the
court what she perceived to be the relevant factual background.  During her
examination-in-chief, Ms. Izquierdo admitted that she had been sanctioned by
the courts in Peru for her behaviour on some occasions in failing to have the
child ready for visits with his father.
[68]      Regarding
Mr. Berendson, there was a palpable dichotomy as to Mr. Berendson’s
presentation in the witness stand.  When giving evidence relating to
non-controversial matters, including particularly during his evidence-in-chief,
Mr. Berendson generally was a reliable witness.  This included testimony about
his family’s background, his experience living with a family in the United
States as an exchange student, his varied work experience and his activities
and experiences while living in Canada.
[69]      However,
when confronted with controversial topics, and in particular topics focusing on
his impugned behaviour, Mr. Berendson’s presentation and credibility were
transformed.  Mr. Berendson disliked any line of questioning that portrayed him
in a negative light.  He became argumentative and non-responsive; he falsely
accused the questioner of bullying him; he made attempts to engage the
questioner in an argumentative dialogue; when presented with an English translation
of a Spanish document, Mr. Berendson deflected questions about the content of
the English translation, demanding to see the Spanish version, claiming he did
not trust the translator, even though the court had made a ruling on a voire
dire that the translator was competent and qualified to translate from
Spanish to English (the issue pertaining to the translator is discussed later);
he gave answers that were sarcastic or at times outlandish when pressed to
explain his behaviour; Mr. Berendson was adept at employing prevarication to
avoid answering questions that he did not like; and despite having demonstrated
an impressive memory when testifying about many details relating to his
upbringing and work history, Mr. Berendson would profess, unconvincingly, that
he could not remember when presented with a question that he preferred not to
answer.
[70]      Mr.
Berendson was neither a credible nor reliable witness during much of his
cross-examination, and in particular relating to his behaviour and conduct
underpinning the allegations of family violence.  There were occasions when Mr.
Berendson lied brazenly to the court while in the witness stand.
[71]      Unless
otherwise indicated in these reasons, I prefer and accept the evidence of Ms.
Izquierdo and her witnesses where their evidence conflicts with Mr. Berendson’s
evidence.  On issues relating to allegations of family violence inflicted by
Mr. Berendson and its effect on Ms. Izquierdo and others, I find that Mr.
Berendson’s evidence generally is not worthy of belief.
[72]      The
reasons below contain a number of specific examples relating to conflicting
evidence and findings of credibility.
[73]      An
example of Mr. Berendson’s obfuscation during cross-examination related to a proceeding
conducted in Peru in the Piura Superior Court of Justice on August 12, 2022.[15] 
That proceeding was identified as involving family violence.  Mr. Berendson and
Ms. Izquierdo were listed as defendants.  Mr. Berendson attended the hearing;
Ms. Izquierdo did not attend the hearing.  Mr. Berendson was described as
responding to questions “after taking the oath.”  The hearing appears to have
been conducted virtually.
[74]      During
cross-examination by the applicant’s counsel in this trial, Mr. Berendson was
directed to his evidence at the hearing in Peru where he testified that he is
trying to locate his son who has been missing since 2019 along with his mother;
and that he does not know where they are, it might be Canada, but he has no
precise address.  Mr. Berendson was challenged on that evidence, it being
suggested to him that he knew at the time of that hearing that Ms. Izquierdo
and the child were in London, Ontario.  Mr. Berendson responded, “I’m not
sure.”  Thereafter, Mr. Berendson dodged further questions on the topic of the
hearing in Peru, demanding to see the Spanish version and claiming that he did
not trust the English translation.  It is noted that Mr. Berendson’s evidence
to the Peruvian court also included a statement that he has not seen Ms.
Izquierdo since 2019.  Also, it is noted that the applicant’s exhibit brief
containing the document regarding this hearing in Peru, including the Spanish
version and the English translation, had been served on Mr. Berendson in
November 2023.
[75]      The
foregoing evidence given by Mr. Berendson to the Peruvian court on August 12,
2022 was false.  Mr. Berendson knew that Ms. Izquierdo and the child were in
London, Ontario.  He and Ms. Izquierdo had attended a lengthy trial in London
regarding the Hague application that started on September 21, 2020 and
ended February 17, 2021.  Further, as discussed in more detail later in these
reasons, Mr. Berendson had seen the child during some video visits occurring
during the Hague application and shortly after the Hague
application concluded.  In addition, Mr. Berendson was able to physically see
the child during an in-person supervised visit in London, Ontario, although
that visit did not go well as discussed later in these reasons.  Finally,
approximately four months prior to the hearing in Peru, Mr. Berendson had
posted a photo[16]
on social media of himself in a park near the child’s residence, with a poster
containing a message in Spanish to the child.  That occurrence is discussed in
more detail later in these reasons where Mr. Berendson’s evidence is rejected
that he did not know the area in London where the child was residing.
[76]      It
is apparent that Mr. Berendson’s dishonesty when testifying was not limited to
the current trial in Ontario; he also has been dishonest when giving sworn
evidence to the courts in Peru.
[77]      This
trial was scheduled to commence in November 2023.  It was adjourned to April
2024 as a result of Mr. Berendson’s counsel bringing a motion to be removed as
counsel of record due to health issues.[17]
[78]      This
trial took significantly longer than estimated.  Additional time was necessary
because substantial portions of the evidence required interpreters.  However,
both parties spent too long in the witness stand.  There were occasions when
the court had to place and enforce limits on the testimony of the parties, and
witnesses.  I would add, for clarity, that the undue length of this trial was
not attributable in any way to the OCL.  During the trial, the court prohibited
cellphones in the courtroom.[18]
[79]      Both
parties did assist by paring down their respective witness lists.  For the
applicant, as mentioned earlier, this included not calling two of her adult
children as witnesses during the presentation of her case; the applicant did
reserve the right to call those two witnesses in reply should circumstances
require and that did occur as discussed in these reasons.
[80]      There
were aspects of Mr. Berendson’s behaviour during the trial that added to the
delays.  While Mr. Berendson’s behaviour included times when he was polite and
respectful, there were occasions when his conduct was disruptive.  Over the
course of the trial, Mr. Berendson was prone to making impromptu statements
that were not responsive to any evidentiary issues or any requests for
submissions.  Mr. Berendson complained about not feeling comfortable in the
courtroom.  He made unjustified complaints about the lawyers; he made unfounded
complaints about the location of courtroom cameras and what was being displayed
on the courtroom computer screens; he questioned the presence of courtroom
security officers asking why they were there and he made baseless complaints
about the location in the courtroom where the security officers were seated.
[81]      On
one occasion, on the record, the court had to deal with a complaint from a male
interpreter[19]
about Mr. Berendson’s behaviour while they were both in the washroom during a
recess.  Although Mr. Berendson was apologetic, the court was required to spend
time dealing with this matter, and directing that there shall be no further
communications with interpreters outside of the courtroom; as the trial
continued however, it became necessary for the court to repeat that directive.
[82]      On
another occasion, prior to the court being called into session at the start of
the day, there was an occurrence in the courtroom involving Mr. Berendson and a
police officer, while others, including counsel, were present.[20] 
This was referred to briefly, on the record, when the court was called into
session.  However, Mr. Berendson was not present in the courtroom and the trial
had to be stood down while the registrar, on the court’s direction, emailed Mr.
Berendson requiring his return so that the trial could continue.
[83]      Later
in the trial, during cross-examination by the OCL, Mr. Berendson had been asked
about his proposal to have the child live with him for up to 90 days and how
that would be enforced and whether the police would have to “drag” the child
out.  Mr. Berendson, ignoring the question, then gave his account of his
interaction with the police officer claiming that he had been “dragged” out of
the courtroom and he blamed OCL counsel for failing to intervene; it was that
accusation against OCL counsel by Mr. Berendson that prompted OCL counsel to
put a few questions to Mr. Berendson in cross-examination focusing on Mr.
Berendson’s alleged improper behaviour during the police occurrence.
[84]      It
is beyond the scope of this trial to delve into any inquiry as to what had
occurred in the courtroom while the court was not in session.  Any search for
the truth regarding this incident would require witnesses who were present,
including police, to give evidence and to be cross-examined.  The OCL properly
refrained from any further cross-examination regarding this matter which had
been raised by Mr. Berendson and was not responsive to the question he was
asked.  Accordingly, I make no finding as to what occurred between Mr.
Berendson and the police in the courtroom while the court was not in session. 
This matter however did result in the trial being delayed due to Mr. Berendson
not being present when court resumed.
[85]      Mr.
Berendson failed to comply with the court-ordered deadline that required both
parties and the OCL to serve and file with the court prior to trial all
documents to be relied on; and the documents once filed with the court and
accepted by the court, then could be uploaded to CaseLines.[21]
[86]      When
the trial started, counsel were not aware of the documents Mr. Berendson
intended to rely on because of his failure to serve, and then file the
documents with the court with proof of service.  Ms. Izquierdo had to begin her
evidence without knowing the extent of Mr. Berendson’s proposed documentary
evidence.
[87]      Mr.
Berendson’s approach was to upload documents into CaseLines without first
properly serving and filing the documents with proof of service, and without
waiting for confirmation from the court that the documents were properly filed
before loading them into CaseLines.  It was not possible for counsel to assist
Mr. Berendson by reviewing his documents in CaseLines, even if not properly
served and filed with the court, with a view perhaps to consenting to the
admission of some documents, because Mr. Berendson was loading pages of
documents into CaseLines by the thousands.
[88]      Approximately
halfway during the trial, the court noted that Mr. Berendson’s documentary
disclosure process was chaotic; that he had at that point, loaded over 383
documents into CaseLines totalling over 5,300 pages.  Mr. Berendson claimed
that there was no prejudice to counsel because counsel allegedly were familiar
with the documents in any event.  However, that prompted valid objections from
counsel, in particular the OCL, because the OCL had not been involved in the
first trial.  By the time this current trial was concluded, Mr. Berendson’s
documents loaded into CaseLines exceeded 8,700 pages.
[89]      Early
during the trial, while the court was in session, Mr. Berendson purported to
serve documents by handing each counsel a USB stick containing various
documents.  Understandably, this prompted valid objections, and caused more
delay.
[90]      Mr.
Berendson had ample time to serve and file his documents properly given that
the trial did not start in November 2023 and was adjourned, as noted earlier.
[91]      Accommodations
were made during the trial to allow Mr. Berendson to refer to some of his
documents not properly served and filed.  This included, for example, some
videos of his interaction with the child that were filed as exhibits.  Mr.
Berendson had been most adamant that the videos were important.
[92]      When
Mr. Berendson was given an opportunity to file some of his documents as
exhibits, notwithstanding his failure to serve and file all his documents prior
to trial as ordered, the court gave specific direction to Mr. Berendson
regarding the procedure to do so, including serving the intended exhibits on
counsel within a specified time frame.  Despite this accommodation, there were
instances where Mr. Berendson failed to comply with the court’s direction.  One
such instance included Mr. Berendson’s failure to comply with the court’s
direction relating to Mr. Berendson’s desire to file various photographs as
exhibits.[22]
[93]      The
issue relating to Mr. Berendson’s documents caused ongoing delay and
distraction, including requiring a voire dire.  Mr. Berendson would
attempt to refer witnesses to documents that he had uploaded to CaseLines but
had failed to properly serve and file with the court.  This would prompt
justifiable objections from counsel and took up unnecessary trial time.
[94]      Near
the end of the trial, Mr. Berendson submitted that he had been blocked from
CaseLines.  He asked whether the judiciary had blocked him.  Mr. Berendson was
advised that that had not occurred.  Mr. Berendson then was provided with
contact information for CaseLines and the registrar was instructed to assist
Mr. Berendson in that regard should Mr. Berendson request assistance.
[95]      It
is apparent that Mr. Berendson is adept at using a laptop.  He testified, as
noted later in these reasons, that he conducted computer workshops as part of
his volunteer work.  It is notable that Mr. Berendson provided no credible
evidence, including from CaseLines, to corroborate his submission that he had
been blocked from CaseLines.
[96]      Mr.
Berendson’s written closing argument submitted July 5, 2024 had appended to it
various documents that were not in evidence.  These documents included a
letter, a London police records check and a court decision from Peru dated June
10, 2024.
[97]      On
July 12, 2024, when oral argument was heard, Mr. Berendson was given an opportunity
to file additional written submissions limited to the issue of the applicant’s
claim under s. 140 of the Courts of Justice Act, said submissions not to
exceed 10 pages.  Mr. Berendson failed to comply with this order.  His written
submissions with attachments totalled 73 pages and included submissions not
related to s. 140.  I have considered only submissions related to s. 140.  Mr.
Berendson also included affidavits and two decisions from the courts in Peru
dated August 1, 2018 and September 3, 2019.
[98]      The
documents that Mr. Berendson appended to his written closing submissions
including the letter, police records check and affidavits have not been
considered because they are not included in the exhibits filed at trial.  Any
Peruvian court decisions appended to Mr. Berendson’s written submissions have
not been considered, unless those decisions have been included in the exhibit
briefs filed in this trial.
[99]      The
applicant’s two main exhibit briefs[23]
had been served and filed in November 2023, well in advance of this trial. 
These two exhibits contained various Spanish documents accompanied by
translations into English.  Many of the Spanish documents related to court
proceedings, including criminal investigations, in Peru.  Near the beginning of
the trial, Mr. Berendson complained that the translator used by the applicant
to translate documents from Spanish to English was not qualified to do the
translations.  The basis of Mr. Berendson’s complaint came from an email
received by Mr. Berendson in November 2023 from the Association of Translators
and Interpreters of Ontario (ATIO).  As a result, a voire dire was held
to determine whether the translator was properly qualified.  It is sufficient
for the purpose of these reasons to note that the translator was found to be
qualified to do the translations.  The court provided detailed reasons in the
ruling on the voire dire, which included a finding that Mr. Berendson
had not disclosed to counsel, prior to trial, any issue concerning the
translations, notwithstanding that in November 2023 he had been in possession
of the ATIO email and the two exhibit briefs that contained the Spanish
documents and the translations.
[100]                         
Throughout the trial, and despite the ruling on the voire dire,
Mr. Berendson continued to deflect questions during cross-examination when he
was shown a translated document; Mr. Berendson as noted earlier would complain
that he did not trust the translator.  Trial delays ensued because Mr.
Berendson refused to accept the court’s ruling.
[101]                         
Also noteworthy, is that despite being given an opportunity
during the trial, Mr. Berendson failed to adduce any evidence that addressed,
specifically, any instances where the applicant’s translator made errors
translating documents from Spanish to English.  This issue continuously raised
by Mr. Berendson created unnecessary delays in the trial.
[102]                         
While much of Mr. Berendson’s behaviour during the trial
explained in part why the trial took longer than necessary, I do not take that
behaviour into account when deciding the issues in this case, other than the
issue related to s. 140 of the Courts of Justice Act.
[103]                         
At the court’s request, the applicant’s counsel served and filed,
during the course of the trial, a brief[24]
containing the court orders made in Peru regarding parenting.  The court’s
request was necessary because after the trial started, Ms. Izquierdo made
reference to some of these parenting orders, but the orders had not been filed
as exhibits by either party.  In addition, as noted earlier, Mr. Berendson was
seeking recognition and enforcement of Peruvian orders pursuant to s. 41 of the
Children’s Law Reform Act, but those orders had not been filed as
exhibits.  The contents of the proposed Peruvian court orders brief was
discussed on the record and included some orders requested specifically by Mr.
Berendson.
[104]                         
The discussion on the record, during the trial, revealed some
challenges regarding which translation to use pertaining to the three appeal
decisions made in 2019 in the Superior Court of Justice of Piura, Second Civil
Court.  These three appeal decisions consisted of the main appeal decision
dated April 17, 2019[25],
followed by two brief decisions[26]
dated May 10, 2019 and June 28, 2019 containing corrections to the first
decision.
[105]                         
For each of those three decisions there were two sets of
translations; one set of translations was from Peru and the other set of
translations was from Ontario.  The Peruvian court orders brief included both
sets of translations for all three appellate court decisions.  Submissions
during this trial centered around the main appeal decision (Decision No. 2
dated April 17, 2019).  The applicant’s counsel submitted during that during
the Hague application trial that Mr. Berendson’s counsel had obtained
the Ontario translation because of concerns for the accuracy of the Peruvian
translation, and that the Ontario translation was relied on during that trial. 
Mr. Berendson did not dispute this submission.
[106]                         
The applicant’s counsel further submitted that during the appeal
to the Court of Appeal for Ontario, that Mr. Berendson who was
self-represented, filed the Peruvian translation (of decision No. 2 dated April
17, 2019) rather than the Ontario translation relied on during the trial. Mr.
Berendson did not dispute that submission.  In its decision[27],
the Court of Appeal for Ontario summarized and relied on the Peruvian appellate
court decision dated April 17, 2019 (Decision No. 2).
[107]                         
Pursuant to an endorsement made during this trial[28],
it was ordered that the Ontario translation would be used for this trial for
the Peruvian order dated April 17, 2019, and that the Peruvian translations
would be used for the two remaining orders.  The endorsement also provided a
process to deal with any issues regarding the translations.[29] 
However, none of the parties complied with the order as it related to
rectifying any potential translation errors.
[108]                         
The parties did identify, on consent, a translation error
contained in the Ontario translation for the order dated April 17, 2019.[30]
[109]                         
The parties, shortly after separation, had entered into a
conciliation process where they agreed to a parenting arrangement.  Thereafter
the conciliation agreement was approved, by the First Family Court in Piura by
order dated November 6, 2014.[31]
[110]                         
The conciliation agreement approved by the court included the
following:
[111]                         
There was no indication in the conciliation agreement, and
subsequent court order, that the parenting and child support provisions were
other than final.
[112]                         
Following Ms. Izquierdo’s move to Lima, proceedings were
initiated by both parties to change the existing order.
[113]                         
The court made a decision that included the following:[32]
[114]                         
The decision dated August 1, 2018 was appealed by both parties. 
There were also three other court orders that were appealed but those three
appeal decisions are not relevant in regards to determining the status of the
parenting order that was in place following the appeal decisions.
[115]                         
The appeal decision dated April 17, 2019[33]
upheld the decision dated August 1, 2018 to declare the cautionary measure of
temporary shared custody (as had been requested by Mr. Berendson) on the
following terms:
[116]                         
The second appeal decision was dated May 10, 2019.[34] 
This order resulted from Mr. Berendson’s request to correct an error so that
the visitation dates of Tuesday and Thursday from 3:00 p.m. to 6:00 p.m. were
added to the visitation schedule.  The appeal court corrected the error and
restated in full the order made on April 17, 2019 which included the provision
for Tuesday and Thursday visits.
[117]                         
The third appeal decision was dated June 25, 2019.[35] 
This order resulted from Mr. Berendson’s request to correct the order made May
10, 2019 because when the full order was restated, it did not include the
reference to joint temporary custody, but rather referred to only a temporary
visitation arrangement.  The appeal court corrected this error and stated that
the arrangement was joint temporary custody.
[118]                         
It is trite to observe that an individual who harbours evil
intent can use social media for purposes of targeting, harassing and destroying
peoples’ lives.  In this lengthy trial, there was abundant evidence that Mr.
Berendson did just that in relation to Ms. Izquierdo.  Mr. Berendson’s use of
social media also had deleterious effects on Ms. Izquierdo’s three adult
children.
[119]                         
The OCL characterized Mr. Berendson’s behaviour as a “reign of
terror on the maternal family by father.”[36] 
While condemnation in such strong language must be reserved for the most
egregious of cases, I find on the evidence that this is such a case.  Mr.
Berendson’s behaviour is psychological abuse and constitutes family violence.
[120]                         
What is striking and highly concerning about Mr. Berendson’s
conduct in relation to his use of social media is that he made no effort to
deny the behaviour, nor did he attempt to explain it.  When cross-examining Ms.
Izquierdo and her witnesses, Mr. Berendson did not challenge nor confront them in
any meaningful way, if at all, about their evidence as to how Mr. Berendson’s social-media
conduct affected them.
[121]                         
Mr. Berendson’s written closing submissions[37]
do not contain any discussion about his impugned behaviour.  During his oral closing
submissions, Mr. Berendson feigned surprise and expressed concern that his behaviour
was being addressed – a most disingenuous position, I find, given the many
weeks of evidence heard by the court.
[122]                         
The discussion of the evidence in this part of the reasons, and
the immediately following part, focuses primarily on Mr. Berendson’s behaviour
regarding social media, although in relation to Ms. Izquierdo’s daughter, J,
the discussion also includes other aspects of Mr. Berendson’s treatment of J. 
Other family violence including physical violence, is discussed separately in
these reasons.
[123]                         
During the course of Mr. Berendson’s lengthy evidence-in-chief,
the court encouraged and reminded Mr. Berendson, on multiple occasions, to
ensure that he addressed the evidence that the applicant had put in relating to
Mr. Berendson’s family violence, including his use of social media, his death
threat, and physical violence including the fracture of Ms. Izquierdo’s finger.
[124]                         
Ms. Izquierdo was married previously to Mr. Sandoval.  As noted
earlier, he is the father of her two eldest children, H and J.
[125]                         
Ms. Izquierdo had married Mr. Sandoval in the earlier 1990s and
had separated from Mr. Sandoval approximately five years later.  Subsequently,
Ms. Izquierdo started a relationship with Mr. Mimbela, D’s father.  Ms.
Izquierdo had not kept in touch with Mr. Sandoval.  The last she knew was that
he was living in southern Chile with his new family.  Ms. Izquierdo explained
that she and Mr. Mimbela had learned in or about 2005 that Mr. Sandoval was
apparently deceased.  They did some research to corroborate this – Ms.
Izquierdo testified there was a medical and death certificate and a
gravestone.  It was Ms. Izquierdo’s understanding that Mr. Sandoval had died in
2004.  However, Ms. Izquierdo was told by Mr. Berendson shortly after their
separation that Mr. Sandoval was alive.  Ms. Izquierdo testified she then learned
that Mr. Sandoval had faked his own death.
[126]                         
It was at this point that Mr. Berendson embarked on a long
journey of intimidation and harassment of Ms. Izquierdo by accusing her of
bigamy – that she had married Mr. Berendson knowing that Mr. Sandoval was
alive.  Mr. Berendson accused Ms. Izquierdo of colluding with Mr. Sandoval to
fake his own death.  Mr. Berendson instigated a criminal complaint process
against Ms. Izquierdo in 2014 alleging bigamy.  It was Ms. Izquierdo’s unchallenged
evidence that criminal charges were not laid and that this criminal process was
dismissed after a number of years.  She also testified that Mr. Berendson
appealed to the superior prosecutor who also dismissed the complaint.  There
was no credible evidence from Mr. Berendson challenging these assertions by Ms.
Izquierdo. Furthermore, Mr. Berendson’s pursuit of criminal charges through the
prosecutor’s office included a dismissal by the prosecutor’s office to re-open
an appeal decision confirming the dismissal of the criminal complaint.[38]
[127]                         
While discussing this criminal process instigated by Mr.
Berendson, Ms. Izquierdo became emotionally overwrought in the witness stand.
[128]                         
The fact that Mr. Sandoval had faked his own death was not at
issue in this trial.  The issue centered around Mr. Berendson’s campaign to
portray Ms. Izquierdo as a bigamist, including doing so on a national level in
Peru.
[129]                         
Ms. Izquierdo worked as a lawyer in Peru.  She was living in
Piura when she was married to Mr. Berendson.  At the time of separation, Ms.
Izquierdo described herself as financially responsible not only for the child M
but also for her other three children, D, J and H, who are were approximately ages
12, 17 and 20, respectively, when the parties separated.
[130]                         
As a lawyer, Ms. Izquierdo worked in Piura as a government
official for the municipal council in Piura.  Mr. Berendson raised the bigamy
issue while Ms. Izquierdo was working in Piura.  Ms. Izquierdo testified that
Mr. Berendson would bring documents addressed to the mayor and other elected
authorities that contained complaints of bigamy against her.  Mr. Berendson
sought out journalists and articles were published, including Ms. Izquierdo’s picture,
in a newspaper.  As Ms. Izquierdo testified, she worked with politicians, and
it presented for them an image problem to be seen with Ms. Izquierdo given the
allegations being made against her by Mr. Berendson.
[131]                         
I accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence, that as a consequence, she
lost her employment in Piura.  She testified, emotionally, that she had to
leave Piura.  She did so in early 2017 and secured new employment in Lima,
which was approximately 1,000 kilometres from Piura.  Ms. Izquierdo moved to
Lima taking M with her.  This move created significant acrimony between the
parties and resulted in numerous additional court proceedings, including
criminal complaints.
[132]                         
Mr. Berendson elevated his social media attacks against Ms.
Izquierdo to describe her also as a child abductor.  (There is more discussion
later in these reasons about the parenting-time issues that emanated as a
consequence of Ms. Izquierdo’s move to Lima.)
[133]                         
Ms. Izquierdo filed an exhibit brief that contained numerous
social media posts from Mr. Berendson[39].
 During the trial, in order to reduce the documentary evidence, Ms. Izquierdo
agreed to rely only on certain documents contained in the social media brief,
with the caveat that if it became necessary during the trial, then Ms.
Izquierdo could request the court to rely on an excluded document.[40] 
A similar process was utilized by Ms. Izquierdo regarding her main exhibit
brief.[41] 
While it is not necessary to discuss in detail the entire contents of the applicant’s
social media brief, these reasons do make reference to some specific social
media postings, in particular the ones discussed by Ms. Izquierdo in her
evidence.  Where indicated, some specific social media postings are filed also
as separate exhibits.
[134]                         
In early 2017, Ms. Izquierdo did obtain employment in Lima;
however, Mr. Berendson, according to her evidence, had contact with her
employer in Lima.  Ms. Izquierdo testified that her boss showed her his
cellphone with a telephone number on it to confirm that he had had contact with
Mr. Berendson.  Also, Mr. Berendson testified that he did speak to Ms.
Izquierdo’s boss.  Ms. Izquierdo’s boss did not testify, and hence, statements
made by him to Ms. Izquierdo as to his conversation with Mr. Berendson are not
admissible for the truth of those statements.
[135]                         
However, Mr. Berendson did admit that he told Ms. Izquierdo’s
boss that Ms. Izquierdo had just abducted their son from Piura.  Mr. Berendson
also admitted he was asked, “What is happening with this dead man being
alive?”  Mr. Berendson testified he responded that that was not his problem. 
Given Mr. Berendson’s extensive campaign regarding the bigamy accusations
against Ms. Izquierdo, it is difficult to accept Mr. Berendson’s evidence that
his statement was limited to this issue not being his problem.
[136]                         
It was Ms. Izquierdo’s testimony that around June 2017, a show
was broadcast on television on a national level that dealt with the “bigamy” allegations
Mr. Berendson had been making against her.
[137]                         
Ms. Izquierdo gave evidence about some specific social media
posts made by Mr. Berendson.  As an example, on Mr. Berendson’s YouTube
account, there were four screenshots showing four videos.[42] 
The videos are of various lengths as shown in the screenshots.  One video
screenshot shows Ms. Izquierdo with the caption “Breach of visitation regime.”  Another
screenshot video has the caption “Bigamy” followed by Ms. Izquierdo’s name. 
Another video has the caption “Piura man who was not dead.”  Ms. Izquierdo
identified that two specific videos discuss the bigamy allegations.  It was
also Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that one of the videos in this YouTube post,
specifically the video shown to have a length of 10 minutes and 30 seconds, was
the subject of broadcast on a national level in Peru.
[138]                         
Ms. Izquierdo testified that she was not doing well on the day following
the national broadcast about her.  She had arranged for a lawyer to come to her
home that day to discuss that broadcast.  While she was meeting with the
lawyer, Mr. Berendson attended at her home in Lima with two police officers,
indicating he was there to exercise his parenting time with the child.  I
accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that she did not know that Mr. Berendson was
coming to Lima.  She testified that he just showed up with the police
officers.  It was Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that Mr. Berendson was not there to
exercise parenting time but rather to mock her, and to show her how powerful he
was in promoting a broadcast on a national level and then showing up at her
home as if nothing had happened.
[139]                         
Mr. Berendson did not specifically address this occurrence in his
evidence nor did he question Ms. Izquierdo about it during his
cross-examination.  However, Mr. Berendson did post a message on his YouTube
account.[43] 
In this message, Mr. Berendson complains that Ms. Izquierdo failed to comply with
the visitation regime.  He also accuses Ms. Izquierdo of being under the
influence of drugs that day.
[140]                         
I prefer and accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence as to what happened
the day following the broadcast rather than the information posted by Mr.
Berendson in his YouTube account.
[141]                         
Mr. Berendson also made social media posts as follows:
[142]                         
After losing her job in Piura, it was Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence
that her contract in Lima was not renewed.
[143]                         
I accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence explaining how she was affected
by Mr. Berendson’s accusations.  Ms. Izquierdo’s description of her suffering,
including emotional and psychological suffering, was compelling.  I found Ms.
Izquierdo’s evidence to be credible, reliable and trustworthy.  She was
affected financially.  The child M, and also her other children, witnessed her
suffering which, in turn, affected them emotionally.  As a lawyer, Ms.
Izquierdo prided herself in her professionalism.  She gave evidence in a most
poignant manner about losing her job, losing her dignity, and enduring
emotional suffering.
[144]                         
The evidentiary record supports the conclusion which I make, that
the bigamy allegations against Ms. Izquierdo were contrived and baseless.  Mr.
Berendson pursued these allegations with the intent of harming Ms. Izquierdo. 
Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that Mr. Berendson was the driving force behind
escalating those allegations into a national news story was not challenged by
Mr. Berendson during his cross-examination of Ms. Izquierdo nor did Mr.
Berendson make any effort to contradict this testimony during his evidence.
[145]                         
Ms. Izquierdo initiated a complaint against Mr. Berendson
regarding the bigamy allegations.  In a document relied on by Ms. Izquierdo
from the Superior Court of Justice in Lima, dated December 19, 2018, Mr.
Berendson was sentenced after having been found guilty of slander and
aggravated damages in relation to the bigamy allegations made against Ms.
Izquierdo.[49] 
While this document does corroborate Ms. Izquierdo’s testimony, there is
sufficient evidence apart from this document to support the aforementioned
findings that the bigamy allegations were contrived and baseless.  It is noted
that Ms. Izquierdo’s documents included a copy of Mr. Berendson’s appeal of
this decision.[50]
However, there was no evidence as to the disposition of the appeal.
[146]                         
After Ms. Izquierdo moved to Lima with the child, she testified
that Mr. Berendson initiated a criminal complaint of abduction against her and
her mother, and also alleged that her three other children were accomplices. 
The prosecutor’s office in Peru released a decision dated May 4, 2017[51]
dismissing these allegations, including making a finding that Ms. Izquierdo had
legal custody of the child.
[147]                         
When cross-examined by Ms. Izquierdo’s counsel, Mr. Berendson agreed
that the kidnapping complaint had been dismissed and that the finding was made
that Ms. Izquierdo did not kidnap the child.
[148]                         
Throughout the course of this trial, Mr. Berendson consistently,
whether in his evidence or during submissions, referred to Ms. Izquierdo moving
with the child to Lima as an “abduction” or “the first abduction”.  Mr.
Berendson continued deliberately to use this misleading description despite the
dismissal of his kidnapping complaints by the prosecutor’s office.  Mr.
Berendson’s branding of the move to Lima as an abduction was unjustified, and
was part of his campaign of psychological abuse of Ms. Izquierdo and also her
adult children.
[149]                         
As indicated earlier, J testified remotely from Lima, Peru.  She
was a credible and reliable witness and in particular gave compelling evidence
regarding Mr. Berendson’s behaviour, including his use of social media, and how
his behaviour affected her and members of her family.  J’s testimony was not
shaken in any way by Mr. Berendson during cross-examination; and in his own
evidence, Mr. Berendson failed to address J’s evidence that was critical of his
behaviour.
[150]                         
I accept J’s evidence, summarized below as being credible,
trustworthy and reliable.
[151]                         
J resides in Peru.  She is a general physician; having graduated
recently, J indicated at the time of trial that she was not yet working.
[152]                         
When Mr. Berendson first started living with her family, J was
quite fond of Mr. Berendson, describing him as a very nice person.  Mr.
Berendson treated her well, including taking her on various outings and
activities that she enjoyed.  She then described Mr. Berendson as having had a
radical change in the way he treated her, her mother and members of her
family.  J moved from Piura in 2014 to attend university.  However, in the
initial years, she would return to Piura to visit one or two times per month,
in addition to visiting during holidays and vacation.  When J’s mother moved to
Lima in 2017, J resumed living with her mother.
[153]                         
J described being stalked by Mr. Berendson.  When she returned to
Piura to visit, it was her evidence that she was afraid to go out in the
street.  Mr. Berendson would follow her and yell at her.  She described walking
many blocks but he was still there.  J testified that the harassment was not
only in person but also on social media.  Mr. Berendson would publish pictures
of her and images of her family, speaking badly about them.
[154]                         
It was J’s evidence that Mr. Berendson contacted her friends’
parents or families of her ex-partners to make derogatory comments about her.  J
described this harassment as continuing for six or seven years until her mother
left the country.
[155]                         
J testified that Mr. Berendson accused her of being a criminal in
relation to the kidnapping allegations.  During the initial years after her
mother left Peru, J described Mr. Berendson as constantly posting on social
media about her family.  This included publishing pictures of her – including a
picture J had previously taken showing J and the child M outside of the
university she was attending.  Mr. Berendson’s social media posts stated this
was the last place where the child was seen.
[156]                         
Mr. Berendson in his social media posts “tagged” the university
with pictures of her, saying she was a medical student at the university, that
she was a criminal and had kidnapped Mr. Berendson’s son.
[157]                         
J also received copies of the social media posts from friends; J
explained that these posts were available to people who were students at the
university.  It was J’s description that Mr. Berendson successfully defamed
her.
[158]                         
In relation to her evidence of being followed by Mr. Berendson, J
testified that Mr. Berendson would videorecord her.  She described Mr.
Berendson as yelling at her, insulting her, and making arm and hand gestures
directed at her.  She testified specifically about Mr. Berendson gesturing at
her with the middle finger of his hand, as an insult directed at her, and Mr.
Berendson making a gesture of moving his hand across his neck.
[159]                         
During cross-examination by the OCL, J testified about statements
made by Mr. Berendson to her in front of the child.  On one such occasion, Mr.
Berendson called her a drug addict and an alcoholic, and on another such
occasion, Mr. Berendson insulted her by making comments implying that she was
looking for men.  J was asked about Mr. Sandoval, her biological father, who
had faked his own death.  J recalled being quite young when she was told that
her father had died.  In 2014, she learned he was alive.
[160]                         
It was J’s evidence that Mr. Berendson mocked her that Mr.
Sandoval was not dead; that Mr. Berendson told J that Mr. Sandoval faked his
death because he did not love her; that Mr. Berendson accused J and her mother
of being criminals, knowing that Mr. Sandoval was not dead.  J testified that
she had no knowledge Mr. Sandoval was alive until receiving that information in
2014.
[161]                         
J confirmed that when she visited Piura, that the bigamy
allegations against her mother were in newspapers, on the radio, and on
television.  After her mother moved to Lima, J confirmed that the bigamy
allegations were the subject of national news coverage, that Mr. Berendson was
featured in the story portraying her mother as a bigamist.
[162]                         
Although the national news coverage did not identify Ms.
Izquierdo’s children by name, it was J’s evidence that Mr. Berendson through
his social media postings would share the national news coverage and would
state, by name, that J, her mother, her now-adult siblings and her grandparents
were all involved.  This included publishing pictures of J.  On a Facebook
page, Mr. Berendson shared the national news story and talked about J and her
family, saying that they were all accomplices.  J also testified about the
ridicule that her mother was subjected to by people who were friends of Mr.
Berendson, including derogatory and vulgar descriptions of her mother.
[163]                         
Mr. Berendson’s accusations, his social media postings and the
news coverage had significant effects on J.  She testified feeling shame; she
suffered anxiety and depression; she felt devastated; she sought therapy; at
one point, she struggled, believing Mr. Berendson’s statements that her father
(Mr. Sandoval) did not love her and chose to fake his death; she stopped
visiting Piura for a period of time and lost relationships with her friends;
due to her depression, she lost a lot of weight.  She was in university and
this caused her academic performance to deteriorate; for a period of time, J
took medication to assist her in controlling her emotions.  During
cross-examination by the OCL, J described that in 2017, she had a serious
relationship with her boyfriend; and that Mr. Berendson went to the office of
her boyfriend’s mother showing her documents of the various allegations Mr.
Berendson had made.  J testified that this resulted in ending her relationship
with her boyfriend.  As a consequence, J testified that the child became very
sad as he had enjoyed a loving relationship with J’s boyfriend.  In relation to
her weight loss, J testified that Mr. Berendson would mock her and say that she
was bulimic.  She recalled Mr. Berendson videotaping her and telling her to
throw up.  Mr. Berendson then uploaded that video to his YouTube account.  J
testified that this video was posted in 2017 and was there until approximately
2021.  She assumed that Mr. Berendson removed the video as she had not been
able to find it.
[164]                         
Regarding the effect of Mr. Berendson’s conduct on her half-sibling
D, J testified that he suffered serious depression and attempted suicide on one
occasion.
[165]                         
In relation to the child M, J explained that he could see how the
family was suffering although he was too young to understand what Mr. Berendson
was doing.  She described the child as being intelligent enough to see the
effect on the family.
[166]                         
During cross-examination by the OCL, J added that she tried not
to show the child how she was affected by Mr. Berendson’s conduct but that, at
times, it was difficult for J and also her mother not to cry, and this would
sadden the child.
[167]                         
J’s evidence was passionate when she described how her mother was
affected by Mr. Berendson’s conduct.  J testified her mother suffered a lot. 
She had been a charismatic and happy person.  Her persona and attitude
changed.  Her mother was sad, depressed, and lost her enjoyment of life.  J
testified that her mother wanted to stay strong for the child, but inside she
was destroyed, very sad, and almost always crying in her bedroom.  J testified
that through all of her mother’s suffering, that her mother tried to do her
best for her family.  J stated that Mr. Berendson destroyed her mother’s life.
[168]                         
During the time period of the events described by J, she was a
young woman, ranging in age approximately from her late teen years to her early
twenties.  Considering that Mr. Berendson at one time was in a stepparent role
to J, I find appalling the level of cruelty to which J was subjected.  It is
not an exaggeration to describe Mr. Berendson’s behaviour as harbouring
sadistic overtones.  Despite spending approximately ten days in the witness stand,
Mr. Berendson offered no credible explanation, not even a hint, as to why he
targeted J with his abusive behaviour.
[169]                         
As noted earlier, D, who is Ms. Izquierdo’s youngest adult son,
was called by Ms. Izquierdo as a reply witness.  As part of his case Mr.
Berendson had denied that his behaviour caused harm to the people that the
child loves.  Further, as mentioned earlier, D’s father, Mr. Mimbela, was
called as a witness by Mr. Berendson.  During his testimony, Mr. Mimbela
confirmed that D had attended a clinic in Peru, the suggestion having been made
by Mr. Berendson during his questioning of Mr. Mimbela, that D’s attendance at
the clinic was related to intoxication.  D responded to both of those issues in
reply.
[170]                         
D’s evidence also covered other topics including Mr. Berendson’s
aggressive behaviour at Ms. Izquierdo’s home after separation and Mr. Mimbela’s
accusations of family violence perpetrated against him by Ms. Izquierdo.  These
portions of D’s evidence are discussed later in these reasons.
[171]                         
D was a credible, reliable and trustworthy witness.  I prefer D’s
evidence where it conflicts with Mr. Berendson’s evidence.
[172]                         
D described, during the years, living in terror that something
may happen to him or his family.  He spoke of coming home and seeing his mother
crying.  At one point, early during D’s evidence-in-chief, Mr. Berendson, most
inappropriately, interrupted D’s evidence by asking whether the witness had
been warned about perjury.
[173]                         
D’s testimony as to Mr. Berendson’s conduct towards him and the
effects of Mr. Berendson’s conduct included:
[174]                         
During portions of his testimony, particularly when describing
Mr. Berendson’s behaviour, D became emotional, at times, crying.  Mr.
Berendson, during his cross-examination of D, tactlessly reminded D, that the
day before, D had walked into the washroom at the courthouse while Mr.
Berendson was in the washroom, and Mr. Berendson suggested to D that D stayed
in the washroom, and that he did not run out or display any alarm or shock at
seeing Mr. Berendson.  This insensitive question elicited from D an intense, stentorian
response where D testified that he was in shock, that he stayed in the stall
and that he almost passed out.  While giving this evidence, D was sobbing in
the witness stand.
[175]                         
D acknowledged, during cross-examination by Mr. Berendson, that
as a child, he accompanied Mr. Berendson on various child-focused activities,
including fishing, flying kites, visiting a salt mine, going to Lima to see
paragliders and seeing scale-model airplanes.  However, similar to J’s
evidence, Mr. Berendson’s problematic behaviour described by D occurred after
his mother separated from Mr. Berendson.  D was approximately age 12 at that
time.
[176]                         
In response to question from the OCL, D indicated that Mr.
Berendson never shared or explained to D his purpose in treating D the way that
he did including why Mr. Berendson posted D’s picture wearing a school uniform.
[177]                         
The evidentiary record supports the conclusion that D, like J,
suffered significantly from Mr. Berendson’s abusive conduct.  D’s suicide
attempt also was part of J’s testimony.  The foregoing conclusion that D suffered
significantly from Mr. Berendson’s behaviour is supportable independently by other
evidence including the testimony of Ms. Izquierdo and J. However, D’s testimony
does serve to corroborate that other evidence.
[178]                         
H was called in reply to respond to Mr. Berendson’s accusation
that H had shot Mr. Berendson during an alleged incident that had occurred
prior to the parties’ separation, and to reply to Mr. Mimbela’s accusation
against Ms. Izquierdo.  In addition, H’s evidence included a reply to Mr.
Berendson’s denial that Mr. Berendson had kicked open the door to Ms.
Izquierdo’s residence after separation.  The foregoing evidence is dealt with
later in these reasons.
[179]                         
H is a psychologist.  He received his training in Peru.  H’s
evidence as to Mr. Berendson’s treatment of his mother, including the use of
social media, was canvassed primarily during cross-examination including
cross-examination by Mr. Berendson.  H’s testimony regarding how Mr.
Berendson’s conduct affected him was responsive to Mr. Berendson’s denial that
his conduct affected people that the child loves.
[180]                         
During cross-examination by the OCL, H testified that he was
present when Mr. Berendson insulted members of his family, including his mother
at parenting-time exchanges and in the presence of the child.
[181]                         
H referred to Mr. Berendson’s social media posts insulting his
sister, referring to her as a criminal as well as H, and making fun of H and
his sister as the children of a dead man.
[182]                         
During cross-examination by Mr. Berendson as to whether H had
seen Mr. Berendson at the movies in Piura (apparently this occurrence being
after Ms. Izquierdo had left Peru with the child),  H acknowledged that he had seen
Mr. Berendson on that occasion.  H was accompanied, according to his evidence,
with his partner at the time and also his father, Mr. Sandoval.  In response to
a somewhat accusatory question from Mr. Berendson about H’s alleged demeaner
towards Mr. Berendson on that occasion, H gave an emotional response, telling
the court that on that occasion Mr. Berendson caused him shame and
embarrassment because Mr. Berendson started yelling, referring to H’s father as
the “dead man” and making fun of his father in front of other people who were
present, creating a spectacle, while at the same time video recording the
occurrence.  H explained that this was one of the few times that he had gone
out with his father to get to know him a little better.  It is unclear what Mr.
Berendson sought to gain from broaching this topic during cross-examination.
[183]                         
Later during cross-examination, Mr. Berendson ill-advisedly
pressed H about the national news coverage, including whether H had seen his
mother and his father on national television.  H responded in part by telling
Mr. Berendson that he had seen his parents on national television, and accused
Mr. Berendson of publishing this on social media.  At this point, H was very
emotional and could not proceed any further.  At this juncture of H’s
cross-examination, Mr. Berendson had exceeded the extended time limit that had
been given to him to complete H’s cross-examination.[52] 
Further, H had exited the courtroom abruptly in a state of elevated emotional
distress.  As Mr. Berendson had exceeded the time limit, including an extension
of the time limit, that had been given to him to complete H’s
cross-examination, Mr. Berendson was advised that his cross-examination of H
was over.  I assess H’s evidence as described above as being credible, reliable
and trustworthy.
[184]                         
In the current proceeding, MacLeod J. made two interim orders
dated March 9, 2022 – an order prohibiting Mr. Berendson from posting about
this case on social media[53]
(“the social media order”), and a restraining order against Mr. Berendson[54]
(“the restraining order”).  Neither of these orders was appealed and they
remain in effect.  Although there was an earlier restraining order dated
October 7, 2021[55],
these reasons for judgment refer to the order made by MacLeod J. as it
supplants the earlier order.
[185]                         
The restraining order included the following provisions: (a)
prohibiting Mr. Berendson from contacting, communicating directly or indirectly
with Ms. Izquierdo, her partner and the child; (b) Mr. Berendson was not to
come within 500 metres of the place of residence, school and workplace of Ms.
Izquierdo, the child and Ms. Izquierdo’s partner at any time for any purpose;
(c) Mr.  Berendson was restrained from communicating directly or indirectly
with Ms. Izquierdo, her partner and the child via email, social media,
telephone or any other means except as may be specified in subsequent parenting
orders; and (d) Mr. Berendson was not restrained in any way from communicating
with Ms. Izquierdo’s counsel.
[186]                         
Despite the exception to the non-communication provision via a
subsequent parenting order, no interim parenting orders were made after the
date of the restraining order.
[187]                         
The social media order states that Mr. Berendson “… shall not
make social media posts or publications of any manner which specifically name
or identify [the child, the applicant or her partner] in connection with any
litigation, past or present, involving the parents.”
[188]                         
There was evidence in this trial regarding Mr. Berendson’s
inappropriate use of email communication, with some of the emails being used
for the purpose of harassment and intimidation.
[189]                         
An example of this is Mr. Berendson’s email to the Court of
Appeal for Ontario[56]
sent December 1, 2022 at 12:38 a.m.  This email includes the following
statements made by Mr. Berendson in the body of the email:
[190]                         
There are photos of various people attached to the email
including photos of the child and other persons, and a photo showing a room
with flowers and notes attached to the flowers with a casket in the background.
[191]                         
During cross-examination by the OCL about this email, Mr.
Berendson was combative and provided answers that were not responsive to the
questions asked.  He acknowledged writing the email.  He saw nothing wrong with
the email.  Mr. Berendson was asked whether the reference to “watching from the
bleachers” was a reference to the London judiciary.  He denied that but when
asked who he was referring to he stated he did not know and to take it “as a
poem.”  The email was forwarded well after the Court of Appeal for Ontario rendered
its decision in August 2022.  Mr. Berendson acknowledged he had no ongoing
proceeding before that court.
[192]                         
Mr. Berendson was asked repeatedly why he sent this email to the
Court of Appeal for Ontario.  He responded because he felt like writing, adding
that he shared the email with Justin Trudeau.
[193]                         
The OCL counsel pressed Mr. Berendson whether he gave any thought
in sending the email as to the potential impact it might have on the child. 
His facile response was that he did not send the email to any children, that
the email was to “grown-ups”.
[194]                         
The exhibit also includes an email from the judicial assistant
from the Regional Senior Justice containing a message from the Regional Senior
Justice to both parties’ counsel in this case.  The message indicates that
counsel are being forwarded a copy of Mr. Berendson’s email and attachments and
refers to the content as concerning for reasons that will be obvious to
counsel.  In relation to Mr. Berendson evidence that this email message was
sent to “grown-ups”, Mr. Berendson was asked whether he would agree that the
grown-ups would include court staff who might be concerned about the contents
of this email.  Mr. Berendson’s cavalier response was that they never told him
anything about their concerns and he suggested to OCL counsel that she is
welcome to bring them to court and ask them.
[195]                         
Mr. Berendson kept insisting that the child has nothing to do
with this email and he brushed off all suggestions that he had any
responsibility if there were some consequences to the child as a result of this
email.
[196]                         
In fact, there were consequences to the email.
[197]                         
It was Ms. Izquierdo unchallenged evidence during
cross-examination by the OCL that she received word from her lawyer, as a
result of the email, to pick up the child from school for safety reasons.  It
was Ms. Izquierdo’s testimony that when she attended the school to pick up the
child, that the child was scared and surprised.  As part of the safety plan,
the mother, her partner and child stayed in a hotel for almost five days and
the child did not go to school.  The mother indicated that the child was told
that they would be away from the house for a few days.
[198]                         
This incident demonstrates that Mr. Berendson has no boundaries
as to whom he sends emails to and what he says in the emails.  The contents of
the email and the reference to death, and the photographs are disturbing.  This
email raises legitimate concerns about the state of Mr. Berendson’s mental
health, his lack of judgment and his failure to recognize how his conduct can
impact others including the child.
[199]                         
 The OCL was scheduled to present the OCL case on the morning of
May 14, 2024.  The OCL clinician was the scheduled witness.  Shortly before
court was scheduled to start that morning, Mr. Berendson forwarded an email[57]
to both OCL counsel and the applicant’s counsel containing three attachments,
including an attachment described as the “Witness sworn declaration death
threat”[58]
(the other two attachments[59]
are not relevant).
[200]                         
The “Witness sworn declaration death threat” is a document in
Spanish that was translated.  Portions of the translation, and also the
original Spanish version are redacted.  In the statement, the deponent whose
name is redacted, declares under oath that in the month of January 2020, that
Mr. Berendson approached the deponent and asked whether the deponent knew where
his son was.  Because of the redactions it is not clear where the statement was
taken but it appears to have been made and sworn in Peru.  The date is July 21,
2020.  The deponent responded no; the statement indicates that the deponent was
scared because of how violently Mr. Berendson spoke to the deponent.  The
deponent stated that Mr. Berendson told the deponent that if Ms. Izquierdo does
not give Mr. Berendson the child that he can kill Ms. Izquierdo and her partner
because he will not allow his son to have a stepfather; Mr. Berendson also told
the deponent that any time he has a chance that he will take the child and kill
himself and the child.  The deponent deposes being horrified by Mr. Berendson’s
comments and in the statement further deposes that the deponent fears for “my
life and integrity” if Mr. Berendson finds out the statement is made and the
deponent asks that the deponent’s personal information be kept confidential to
guarantee the deponent’s safety.
[201]                         
It was suggested to Mr. Berendson by the OCL during
cross-examination that the purpose of sending this document was to intimidate,
warn and threaten both OCL counsel and the OCL witness.  Mr. Berendson rejected
that suggestion.  His evidence included that this document was not his evidence
but rather was a document obtained by Ms. Izquierdo for the Hague application
trial.  Mr. Berendson suggested that he was serving this document (and the
other two documents) to file with the court.
[202]                         
That explanation is not credible in the least.  Earlier in the
trial, Ms. Izquierdo testified that Ms. Berendson had told a witness
(interviewed by the Ministry of Women and Vulnerable Population in Peru) about
his threat to kill Ms. Izquierdo, the child and himself.  Mr. Berendson
promptly, and correctly, objected to this evidence as hearsay and his objection
was sustained.  The deponent of the death threat statement was not called as a
witness in this trial and Ms. Izquierdo did not attempt to file any sworn
statement from any deponent about Mr. Berendson making death threats.
[203]                         
The death threat statement is an inadmissible document for the
truth of its contents.  Mr. Berendson knows that.  It would be inconceivable
that Mr. Berendson was intending to file this document with the court, as the
document would be prejudicial to Mr. Berendson if filed as an exhibit for the
truth of its contents.
[204]                         
I find that Mr. Berendson had no intention to “serve and file”
this document with the court; rather, Mr. Berendson emailed this document just
prior to the start of the OCL’s evidence to scare, threaten or intimidate the
OCL counsel and the OCL witness.
[205]                         
Later that same morning, Mr. Berendson sent a further email[60]
to both counsel, just prior to the OCL witness starting her evidence.  The
subject of the email was “SERVING ONLINE REVIEWS OCL TO BE FILED.”  The body of
the email indicated “please find documents to be filed today to the court.”
[206]                         
The email contained two attachments; one attachment[61]
was an online rating of the OCL witness who was about to testify and the other
attachment[62]
was an online rating of the OCL counsel.
[207]                         
During cross-examination by the OCL, Mr. Berendson was asked
whether he had sent this further email that morning and he professed that he
did not remember.  When presented with the email he agreed that he sent the
email.  The ratings of the OCL witness were very negative and amounted to
personal attacks.  It was not clear who the authors were.  When it was
suggested to Mr. Berendson that the ratings for the OCL witness were uniformly
bad, Mr. Berendson refused to agree and offered a disingenuous response that he
will not judge.  He gave a similar response to the suggestion that the ratings
for the OCL counsel were positive and negative, but mostly negative.  Mr.
Berendson was asked what the purpose was of emailing those reviews.  He claimed
he wanted to bring them to the court’s attention – he wanted to “help the
judge” as he put it.
[208]                         
This response is quite unbelievable.  Also, Mr. Berendson did not
cross-examine the OCL witness regarding any online reviews, nor did he attempt
to file any of the online reviews as exhibits.  Had he done so, the online
reviews would not fall into the category of admissible evidence.  Also, documents
that the parties were relying on for the trial had to be served prior to the
trial pursuant to court orders made at the trial management conference.
[209]                         
Mr. Berendson’s evidence that he allegedly sent these documents
“to help the judge” is nonsense.  Mr. Berendson sent the emails for the purpose
of harassing and intimidating the OCL counsel and her witness.
[210]                         
During the OCL’s cross-examination of Mr. Berendson on May 30,
2024, it was suggested to Mr. Berendson that earlier that morning, he had sent
to OCL counsel and the applicant’s counsel excerpts from the OCL counsel’s
Twitter account that included references to the OCL counsel’s deceased
parents.  Mr. Berendson testified that he sent an email to the OCL counsel that
morning with a compilation of her social media entitled “Shit Show.”  When it
was suggested to Mr. Berendson that this email was sent for the purpose of
intimidation and distraction, he responded that the purpose of the email was
“to inform the judge.”  Mr. Berendson then added that the document is in
CaseLines and he began to instruct the OCL to open the document in CaseLines. 
The OCL counsel understandably did not oblige.
[211]                         
Mr. Berendson’s behaviour in emailing a compilation of OCL
counsel’s Twitter account that morning has only one conceivable purpose and
that would be to annoy, distract, harass or intimidate OCL counsel.  Mr.
Berendson’s behaviour including the label he attached to the compilation also is
disturbing because it is evidence that Mr. Berendson’s propensity to harass and
intimidate is not restricted to Ms. Izquierdo and members of the maternal
family.
[212]                         
The process of litigating in this court, does not include
deliberate and willful acts designed to harass and disparage counsel for the
opposing side.  Mr. Berendson’s ill-mannered behaviour does not assist him when
assessing credibility.
[213]                         
Mr. Berendson continued his regular use of social media in Canada
to publicize this case which included his view of his unjust treatment. 
Examples are included the applicant’s social media brief.[63] 
It is not necessary to discuss specifically the various social media postings
as they speak for themselves.  The discussion below however does include a
reference to some of the social media posts that were subject of testimony
during the trial.
[214]                         
I accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that the child was negatively
affected by the social media posts.  On one occasion after coming home from
school, the child spoke about a friend “googling” them and the child asked why
it stated that he was kidnapped.
[215]                         
Ms. Izquierdo gave evidence unchallenged by Mr. Berendson that he
had tampered with the Facebook page for the child’s school such that a picture
of Mr. Berendson and the child appeared in the school’s profile.  As a result,
the school principal contacted Ms. Izquierdo expressing concern and this
resulted in a safety plan being implemented for the child.
[216]                         
As a consequence, Mr. Berendson was blocked from the school’s
Facebook page.  This prompted Mr. Berendson on his “X” account (formerly
Twitter) to post a message[64]
criticizing the school principal for blocking Mr. Berendson, telling the school
principal this is not a Catholic way to act and not to play God (the child
attends a Catholic school).  There is a picture of Mr. Berendson and the child
in this social media post and Mr. Berendson tagged the Catholic and public school
boards with this post which was after the social media order.
[217]                         
During cross-examination by the OCL, Mr. Berendson was asked whether
he gave any thought as to how his posting, including photos, on the school
website would affect the child in relation to his peers.  Mr. Berendson’s
response was to ask rhetorically whether he is a monster and he referred to
evidence (discussed later in these reasons) where the child had a positive
reaction when Mr. Berendson visited the child at his school in Peru.
[218]                         
Mr. Berendson’s response demonstrated his continuing inability to
consider how his conduct can negatively impact the child.
[219]                         
Throughout the trial, on numerous occasions, Mr. Berendson
accused Ms. Izquierdo’s counsel of being involved in an immigration scheme in
collaboration with an immigration lawyer who Mr. Berendson identified by name. 
At other times, Mr. Berendson referred to the alleged scheme as immigration
fraud.  Mr. Berendson coined these phrases in relation to the refugee claim
made in Canada by Ms. Izquierdo and also her partner.
[220]                         
These allegations found there way into Mr. Berendson’s social
media posts.  In one post[65],
made after the social media order, Mr. Berendson posted a photo of the
immigration lawyer stating in part that the lawyer was ruining the child’s life
and that what the lawyer is doing is not legal.  Consistent with Mr.
Berendson’s habit, this post contained various tags including the Immigration
and Refugee Board and the Law Society of Ontario.  Mr. Berendson’s accusations
of immigration fraud and immigration schemes fell into the realm of bald
allegations.  There was no evidence corroborating or substantiating these
allegations.  Rather, this was a tool used by Mr. Berendson to attack Ms.
Izquierdo’s service providers – in this instance, her lawyer.  In addition, Mr.
Berendson testified during cross-examination that he has sued Ms. Izquierdo’s
counsel for “defamation, libel” in small claims court.
[221]                         
I accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that Mr. Berendson targeted
other service providers.  In Peru, he filed complaints against four of Ms.
Izquierdo’s lawyers with their professional regulatory bodies in Peru, with the
result that they could no longer represent Ms. Izquierdo.  Mr. Berendson did
not contradict this evidence, but he did testify that he had instigated a
process against one of the lawyers for bringing forth a “false witness”;
however, there was no credible evidence corroborating that this complaint had
any merit.
[222]                         
Ms. Izquierdo received support from a local organization
providing shelter, support and counselling for abused women and their
children.  It was Ms. Izquierdo’s unchallenged evidence that Mr. Berendson used
social media to discredit the work of this organization and that he published
the name of one of the persons working in that organization.
[223]                         
The foregoing demonstrates that Mr. Berendson employed a strategy
to target Ms. Izquierdo’s service providers as a means of harassment and
intimidation.
[224]                         
For his part, during the course of the trial, Mr. Berendson on
various occasions, either through submissions or as part of his evidence, told
the court that he was afraid of both Ms. Izquierdo’s counsel and the OCL
counsel.  These statements by Mr. Berendson are not believable, are not
corroborated by any credible evidence and were made by Mr. Berendson for the
sole purpose of enhancing a persona that he pursued assiduously throughout the
course of the trial – that he was the victim.
[225]                         
Mr. Berendson had posted a Spanish newspaper article from Peru
dated April 27, 2023 on his Twitter account.[66] 
In that article, Mr. Berendson is quoted discussing this case and the
kidnapping of his son.  In the caption under Mr. Berendson’s picture, the name
is shown as “Carlos Berendson.”  Mr. Berendson had no explanation why he was
identified as Carlos; however, his correct name is stated in the body of the
article.  Mr. Berendson denied suggestions by Ms. Izquierdo’s counsel during
cross-examination that this post was a violation of the social media order. 
The cross-examination devolved into a sparring match where Mr. Berendson was
not credible and made multiple disingenuous statements resisting valid suggestions
that this post was a violation of the social media order.
[226]                         
In his social media posts, Mr. Berendson exhibits little or no
restraint.  In one social media post, referring to Hitler, Mr. Berendson states
“right now in 2023” that people are using “Hitlerian practices” wanting to take
away all his family, and Mr. Berendson refers to being in London, Ontario.[67] 
When asked during cross-examination to explain the reference to Hitler, Mr.
Berendson offered an unconvincing response that he was “venting.”
[227]                         
I am satisfied on the evidence that Mr. Berendson has been
physically abusive towards Ms. Izquierdo.  Some of those occurrences are
described below.
[228]                         
Ms. Izquierdo testified in detail about an incident that occurred
prior to separation where Mr. Berendson began pulling Ms. Izquierdo out of their
car, following an argument.  Ms. Izquierdo held onto the car, but Mr. Berendson
used the car door to hit Ms. Izquierdo’s hand that was gripping the car.  Ms.
Izquierdo suffered a fracture as a result of her hand being hit with the car
door.  Ms. Izquierdo’s testimony included that Mr. Berendson dragged her out of
the car by her hair, that he threw her against some bicycles and then he left. 
One of Ms. Izquierdo’s fingers, as a result of being fractured, has a permanent
deformity that Ms. Izquierdo described during her evidence.  After being
injured during that incident, Ms. Izquierdo had to rely on a friend to take her
to the hospital.
[229]                         
Ms. Izquierdo did not call the police.  She testified she was
embarrassed and did not want her family to know.
[230]                         
Mr. Berendson referred to the “finger-breaking” incident and
testified “I deny those allegations.”  He also stated that he has never pulled
Ms. Izquierdo’s hair.  He did not otherwise specifically respond to Ms.
Izquierdo’s detailed evidence regarding this incident.
[231]                         
During the trial, the court’s various cautions to Mr. Berendson,
during his evidence-in-chief, urging him to respond to allegations made against
him, included specifically this allegation described by Ms. Izquierdo where she
sustained a fracture to her finger.[68]
[232]                         
I accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that the foregoing incident
occurred as she described.  I do not believe Mr. Berendson’s evidence that he
never pulled Ms. Izquierdo by her hair, nor do I believe his evidence denying
the “finger-breaking” allegation.
[233]                         
In 2015, there was the “pepper-spray incident” at Ms. Izquierdo’s
home.  Ms. Izquierdo had a number of guests at her home including her mother,
and her daughter, J.  Mr. Berendson arrived to return the child following his
visit with the child.  Both Ms. Izquierdo and J gave similar evidence as to
what occurred.  According to their evidence, Mr. Berendson unreasonably refused
to hand the child over to either Ms. Izquierdo’s mother or J, demanding instead
that Ms. Izquierdo receive the child personally.  An altercation then ensued
during which Mr. Berendson grabbed Ms. Izquierdo by the neck and pepper sprayed
Ms. Izquierdo’s mother and one other guest.  While the altercation was ongoing,
J removed the child from the car.
[234]                         
During Mr. Berendson’s testimony, he portrayed himself as a
victim, claiming that a number of people who were at Ms. Izquierdo’s home
charged at him and removed the child from the car.  He said he pepper sprayed
the husband of one of Ms. Izquierdo’s friends.  Mr. Berendson claimed that his
car was vandalized by Ms. Izquierdo, her mother and others.
[235]                         
Mr. Berendson did not dispute Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that for a
number of years afterwards that he had pursued a criminal process against Ms.
Izquierdo, her daughter, her mother and others as a result of that incident,
and that eventually the criminal complaint was dismissed.
[236]                         
While I accept Mr. Berendson’s evidence that he pepper sprayed
one of the guests, I do not believe the rest of Mr. Berendson’s evidence
regarding this incident.  He offered no explanation as to why people would
allegedly charge at him just because he was returning the child after a visit. 
I prefer the evidence of Ms. Izquierdo and J.  I find that Mr. Berendson
precipitated this incident with his aggressive and unreasonable behaviour.
[237]                         
Mr. Berendson testified during cross-examination by Ms.
Izquierdo’s counsel that after separation he only attended at Ms. Izquierdo’s
residence for visitation purposes, and nothing more and that he never entered
her house again.  However, there was an incident that occurred on October 23,
2015 in Piura, described by both D and H, which contradicts Mr. Berendson’s
evidence.  This date is confirmed by a police report noting complaints made to
police that day.[69] 
The allegation was that Mr. Berendson kicked open the door to Ms. Izquierdo’s
residence.
[238]                         
The relevance of the police report is to corroborate the date of
the incident.  Mr. Berendson was shown the report during cross-examination and
did not take issue with the date of the occurrence.  Mr. Berendson denied the
suggestion during cross-examination that he had kicked open the door to Ms.
Izquierdo’s residence.
[239]                         
Notwithstanding Mr. Berendson’s denial, I prefer the evidence of H
and D.  Their evidence was consistent and discloses that Mr. Berendson attended
at Ms. Izquierdo’s residence demanding to take the child.  Ms. Izquierdo was
not home at the time.  Mr. Berendson was agitated, yelling and he began kicking
the door and forced it open.  H took the child to a different area of the home
for safety.  H and D’s maternal step-grandfather was called and he attended,
and an altercation ensued between him and Mr. Berendson.  H recalled
specifically that this incident occurred on a Friday as he had plans to go out
that day with some other people who  also were present in the home when the
incident occurred.
[240]                         
It is important to note, as discussed earlier, that at the time
there was an existing court order in Peru dealing with Mr. Berendson’s
parenting time which did not include Fridays.
[241]                         
Ms. Izquierdo testified that Mr. Berendson had forced her to have
sexual relations without her consent.  In his testimony, Mr. Berendson denied
this allegation.  Each party’s evidence on this issue was very brief and
neither party cross-examined the other.  The evidentiary record is insufficient
to make a finding that Mr. Berendson’s family violence included sexual abuse as
alleged by Ms. Izquierdo.
[242]                         
The evidence at trial satisfies me, and I find as a fact, that
while Ms. Izquierdo continued to reside in Piura, that Mr. Berendson repeatedly
intimidated her and others in her home by attending at her home shouting,
swearing, ringing the doorbell and kicking the door.
[243]                         
In particular, Ms. Izquierdo testified that Mr. Berendson would manipulate
a power meter, located outside near her home, disrupting electrical service to
her house.  Ms. Izquierdo stated this frightened the child.
[244]                         
J added that she was present many times when Mr. Berendson came
to the house with no reason to be there as it was not a visitation day and that
he would repeatedly ring the doorbell, scaring her.  Similar to Ms. Izquierdo’s
evidence, J experienced an occasion when she was in the home with a female
friend and Mr. Berendson cut the power service leaving the house in darkness.
[245]                         
Mr. Berendson did not contradict the foregoing specific evidence
relating to his ongoing attendances at Ms. Izquierdo’s home.  Mr. Berendson’s immature
behaviour defies rational explanation.  It constitutes harassment and amounts
to family violence.
[246]                         
It is noted that Ms. Izquierdo obtained a restraining order dated
May 5, 2017 in Peru against Mr. Berendson based on his conduct.[70] 
Although I do not rely on this order in reaching the conclusion that Mr.
Berendson engaged in behaviour amounting to harassment, the order does
corroborate that in Peru Mr. Berendson’s behaviour attracted judicial
sanctions.
[247]                         
Ms. Izquierdo testified about an incident that occurred in
February 2019, when the child was almost 6 years of age, at the beach house
residence of the paternal grandmother in Peru.  Ms. Izquierdo had brought the
child for a visit as Mr. Berendson was there.  While Ms. Izquierdo was saying
goodbye to the child, Mr. Berendson grabbed the child from Ms. Izquierdo, ran
through the house with the child, yelling at Ms. Izquierdo through a window. 
Mr. Berendson had only a towel around him.  The towel fell off during the
incident leaving Mr. Berendson naked.  The child was crying and in significant
emotional distress.  At one point, Mr. Berendson locked himself and the child
in a room.  Eventually, the paternal grandmother was able to intervene and
de-escalate the situation.
[248]                         
It is salient that the child remembered this incident and
recounted the incident to OCL counsel and the clinician.  The child’s recollection
is described in the affidavit of the OCL clinician.[71] 
The child’s recall included his father being angry; having just a towel and
then being naked; his father locking both of them in a room and his paternal
grandmother intervening.  More importantly, the child’s description included
that he was very scared (the child’s statements to the OCL clinician were
admitted into evidence for the truth of the statements as explained later in
these reasons).
[249]                         
Mr. Berendson’s response to OCL counsel’s cross-examination about
the child’s recollection of this incident, was that the child’s recollection
was made-up memory, made up by the OCL.
[250]                         
Mr. Berendson’s bald assertion about a made-up memory by the OCL
is not credible in the least.  I accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence regarding this
incident.  I find that Mr. Berendson’s rather bizarre behaviour frightened the
child and caused the child emotional upset.  Mr. Berendson’s conduct raises
questions about the state of his mental health and emotional stability at the
time.  I find that Mr. Berendson accepts no responsibility for his conduct. 
Although Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence is sufficient, I would add that her son H,
who was also present, testified regarding this occurrence and his evidence
corroborates Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence.
[251]                         
Both parties recalled an incident involving a bus.  The parties
were in their car.  Mr. Berendson was driving and the child was with them.  Mr.
Berendson did not dispute Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that the child was
approximately six or seven months old, and that the incident occurred prior to
separation.  At this point, the parties’ evidence diverges.
[252]                         
Ms. Izquierdo testified that the bus driver had honked.  Mr.
Berendson stopped the car in the middle of the road and stepped out of the
car.  This caused the bus to stop.  Mr. Berendson then took out his gun (which he
always carried with him, according to Ms. Izquierdo) and placed the gun on top
of the car.  He then took a baseball bat out of the car and approached the bus
driver’s window yelling and threatening the bus driver.  Mr. Berendson then
returned to the car and they left with Mr. Berendson driving in an erratic
manner.
[253]                         
Mr. Berendson testified that he did not remember exactly what the
bus driver did, but when the bus stopped, so did Mr. Berendson.  He approached
the bus driver’s window asking him “why did you do that”, telling the bus
driver, “that was a dangerous maneuver.”  At this point, to Mr. Berendson’s
surprise, Ms. Izquierdo exited the car holding the child and began brandishing
his pistol that was in the car.  She then handed the pistol to Mr. Berendson. 
There was no baseball bat according to Mr. Berendson.  He stated he was shocked
and embarrassed; they got back in their car and drove on.
[254]                         
I prefer and accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence where it conflicts
with Mr. Berendson’s evidence.  The evidence in this trial has demonstrated
that Mr. Berendson has had an issue with anger and aggressive behaviour.  Also,
Mr. Berendson testified initially that he could not remember exactly what the
bus driver did, but later changed that narrative by allegedly asking the bus
driver why he engaged in a dangerous maneuver.  Mr. Berendson’s description as
to what provoked the incident lacks consistency and is not credible.
[255]                         
It is also concerning that Mr. Berendson engaged in this
threatening behaviour in the presence of the child.
[256]                         
I turn to Ms. Izquierdo’s allegation that she received a death
threat from Mr. Berendson.  In her evidence-in-chief, Ms. Izquierdo addressed
the death threat on two separate occasions.  By way of context, a petition
dated October 14, 2019[72]
was filed in the Family Court of the Judicial District of Lima by the Ministry
of Women and Vulnerable Population.  This petition was filed on behalf of Ms.
Izquierdo.  The petition sought numerous protection measures against Mr.
Berendson as a result of allegations of abuse against Ms. Izquierdo, the child
M, and Ms. Izquierdo’s children, D and J.  These allegations are described in
the petition.  The protective measures that were sought included a requirement
that Mr. Berendson maintain a specified distance from the alleged victims, that
Mr. Berendson’s permit to carry a firearm be suspended and that Mr. Berendson’s
parenting time be suspended.
[257]                         
Regarding Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence on the first occasion[73],
when asked whether Mr. Berendson threatened her directly, Ms. Izquierdo
testified that he told her on several occasions that he was going to destroy
her, that he would not stop until he would see her like a street dog and that
Mr. Berendson would constantly threaten her over the phone and in person that “he
was going to end me.”
[258]                         
On the second occasion[74]
Ms. Izquierdo was referred specifically to the petition and was asked why she
left Peru before the petition had been dealt with.  Ms. Izquierdo testified
that Mr. Berendson was upset about the petition, that he called her to insult
her, that he “said curse words” and “at that moment he said he had to finish
me.”  Ms. Izquierdo added that the “death threats” he made on this occasion,
caused her to go into “panic mode.”  Ms. Izquierdo also was aware that Mr. Berendson
had a permit to carry a firearm.
[259]                         
Mr. Berendson forcefully denied that he ever made any death
threats.  His denial was a general statement; he did not address specifically
the conversation that Ms. Izquierdo said they had following the filing of her petition.
[260]                         
I find Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence regarding the death threat made
by Mr. Berendson to be credible.  I prefer her evidence over Mr. Berendson’s
evidence.  I do not believe Mr. Berendson’s evidence denying that he made a
death threat.
[261]                         
Prior to separation, while Ms. Izquierdo was pregnant with the
child, Mr. Berendson was shot while he and Ms. Izquierdo attended at the
residence of Ms. Izquierdo’s mother.  H and a number of other persons also were
present.
[262]                         
The gist of the significant factual dispute is that Mr. Berendson
claims that H deliberately shot Mr. Berendson with a revolver.  Both H and Ms.
Izquierdo testified that Mr. Berendson accidentally shot himself with his own
revolver while carelessly handling the revolver.
[263]                         
This occurrence was first raised by Mr. Berendson during his
examination-in-chief.  By that time, Ms. Izquierdo had already put in her
case.  Mr. Berendson had not cross-examined Ms. Izquierdo regarding this
incident even though he was aware that she had been present.  While the failure
to do so may have engaged the rule in Browne v. Dunn,[75]
no objection was taken.  Instead, H and Ms. Izquierdo testified about this
incident in reply.
[264]                         
There was no dispute that Mr. Berendson and Ms. Izquierdo had
gone for a visit to Ms. Izquierdo’s mother’s residence.  It was Mr. Berendson’s
evidence that Ms. Izquierdo and H engaged in an argument regarding H’s
girlfriend and that H became angry and aggressive towards his mother.  Mr.
Berendson then warned H not to touch his mother.  At this point, H pulled a
revolver out of his backpack and shot at Mr. Berendson.  Mr. Berendson had
jumped and the bullet went through his left knee and lodged in his right leg. 
Mr. Berendson claimed this happened at the residence of Ms. Izquierdo’s mother,
but outside.
[265]                         
The evidence of Ms. Izquierdo and H was similar.  There were a
number of people in the house.  Mr. Berendson was showing his revolver and
discussing it.  He began to handle it somewhat carelessly, prompting a warning
from Ms. Izquierdo.  At that moment, while the revolver was in Mr. Berendson’s
possession, the revolver fired and Mr. Berendson sustained the injuries that he
had described.
[266]                         
There was no dispute that Mr. Berendson was taken to the hospital
accompanied by Ms. Izquierdo and others who were at the house.  On arrival at
the hospital, they were directed to go to another hospital.
[267]                         
While at the hospital, the police were called and attended.  Mr.
Berendson testified that he did not want H to go to jail so he showed the
police officer his gun license and told the officer that he had accidentally
shot himself while cleaning his gun.
[268]                         
H indicated that he went to the hospital also, but left after his
mother told him that Mr. Berendson was out of danger.  It was not disputed that
Mr. Berendson underwent surgery and that he eventually made a full recovery.
[269]                         
Mr. Berendson agreed during cross-examination by Ms. Izquierdo’s
counsel, that he went to the police approximately five years later, after Ms.
Izquierdo had moved to Lima, to complain about the “attempted murder” by H. 
Mr. Berendson agreed that his criminal complaint was “dismissed.”  Mr.
Berendson also acknowledged that he went to the police in London, Ontario to
revive the complaint against H after H arrived in London.
[270]                         
During that same cross-examination, Mr. Berendson was reminded
that when the incident occurred initially, that he had reported it as an
accidental shooting.  Mr. Berendson responded that that was not correct.  He
was reminded immediately a second time that he had reported to the police an
accidental shooting.  Mr. Berendson’s response was “no”, that he went to the
emergency room and the police officer was there.  Mr. Berendson was reminded
promptly yet a third time that his report to the police was an accidental
shooting.  Mr. Berendson testified that he did not make any reports to the
police.
[271]                         
Mr. Berendson’s evidence that H shot him is not worthy of
belief.  I regard that evidence as a fabrication to harass H as part of Mr.
Berendson’s anger after Ms. Izquierdo moved to Lima (being the “first
abduction” according to Mr. Berendson).  Mr. Berendson had cross-examined H
extensively about this incident, asking detailed questions, including who was
present in the house, and where, the layout of the furniture, where Mr.
Berendson was seated and how Mr. Berendson shot himself.  H recounted
specifically that Mr. Berendson had asked H if he knew anything about weapons;
that Mr. Berendson then showed H his gun, and H testified that at one point Mr.
Berendson was twirling the gun on his finger.  H’s evidence was consistent,
credible and not shaken during cross-examination.  Mr. Berendson created
self-inflicted damage to his own credibility by refusing to acknowledge during
cross-examination that he had reported this matter to the police, initially, as
an accidental shooting.
[272]                         
I accept and prefer H’s evidence that Mr. Berendson accidentally
shot himself while carelessly handling his own revolver inside the home of Ms.
Izquierdo’s mother.  Although I am able to reach this conclusion based on H’s
evidence, it is noted that his evidence was corroborated in all material
aspects by Ms. Izquierdo’s credible evidence.
[273]                         
Mr. Mimbela was a member of the Peruvian air force.  As noted
previously, he testified from Peru and his testimony was in Spanish.  As discussed
earlier, Mr. Mimbela is Ms. Izquierdo’s former partner, and he is D’s father.
[274]                         
Many of the topics pursued by Mr. Berendson during his
examination-in-chief of Mr. Mimbela were of little, if any, relevance to the
issues before the court and do not merit further discussion.  Mr. Mimbela’s
evidence-in-chief, stretching from the afternoon and taking up half of the
following day, was much longer than it should have been as Mr. Berendson was
preoccupied with an agenda that was of little assistance to the court.
[275]                         
Regarding D, I accept Mr. Mimbela’s evidence that Mr. Berendson
promoted telephone contact between D and Mr. Mimbela.  However, during his
examination-in-chief, Mr. Berendson asked Mr. Mimbela whether he recalled D
going to a clinic in Lima for “some sort of intoxication.”  In his response,
Mr. Mimbela did confirm that D was at the clinic.  Given the inuendo that D
attended at the clinic related to “intoxication”, D, during his reply evidence
addressed the reason that he was at the clinic, and as discussed earlier, that
evidence was not helpful in the least to Mr. Berendson.
[276]                         
Mr. Mimbela’s evidence included his observations of the
interaction between Mr. Berendson and the child.  Mr. Mimbela did not see
anything unusual and did not witness the child being afraid of Mr. Berendson. 
Mr. Mimbela was not challenged on this evidence, and while I accept his
evidence, it is noted that Mr. Mimbela’s observations of Mr. Berendson together
with the child were infrequent and isolated.
[277]                         
Regarding the family violence issue, Mr. Mimbela testified that
Ms. Izquierdo during an argument took his pistol that he kept in his briefcase
in a high place and that she pointed the pistol at him and pulled the trigger. 
However, no bullet came out because Ms. Izquierdo did not first take the
necessary step, as explained by Mr. Mimbela, regarding the preparation of the
gun’s chamber.  Mr. Mimbela testified that this incident occurred in January
2010 at their former residence in Piura.  During this incident, Mr. Mimbela
took the gun away from Ms. Izquierdo.  In addition, it was Mr. Mimbela’s
evidence that Ms. Izquierdo caused window-damage to his car, that he drove the
vehicle to the air base to clean out the broken glass and then he drove to
Lima, a distance of approximately 1,000 kilometres.  Mr. Mimbela testified that
Ms. Izquierdo’s children were present during the altercation.  He referred to D
and H by name as being present.
[278]                         
When Ms. Izquierdo first testified in this trial, Mr. Berendson
never put this incident to Ms. Izquierdo during cross-examination as required
by the rule in Browne v. Dunn, supra.  However, no objection was taken
to this evidence.  Instead, Ms. Izquierdo was permitted to testify about this
incident in reply.
[279]                         
During cross-examination it was put to Mr. Mimbela that this
incident never happened; but he rejected that suggestion.
[280]                         
Ms. Izquierdo testified that she has never threatened anyone with
a gun.  She said that the incident described by Mr. Mimbela never happened. 
Ms. Izquierdo corroborated Mr. Mimbela’s evidence to the extent that he always
stored his gun in his briefcase in a high place, but she added that the
briefcase had a code on it and that she had no access to the code and was
unable to open the briefcase.  Ms. Izquierdo further testified that when the
parties separated, that Mr. Mimbela already was living in Lima; that he had
reconnected with his wife; and that Ms. Izquierdo had given him an ultimatum. 
This eventually resulted in Mr. Mimbela leaving their house and taking his
belongings with him.  Ms. Izquierdo testified that Mr. Mimbela drove his Jeep
to the airport and then he drove his Toyota to Lima.  She added that she was
not present when Mr. Mimbela attended at the house taking his belongings and
vehicles and also leaving her a note.
[281]                         
During cross-examination, Mr. Mimbela testified that he had four
vehicles that included a Jeep and a Toyota.
[282]                         
Both H and D testified about this alleged incident in their reply
evidence.  H denied witnessing any occurrence where his mother either pointed a
gun at Mr. Mimbela or was holding a gun.  H also denied witnessing any incident
where his mother damaged the windows of Mr. Mimbela’s car.  D denied witnessing
any occurrence where his mother pointed a gun at his father or damaged any
windows of his vehicle, including during January 2010.
[283]                         
I do not believe Mr. Mimbela.  I accept and prefer Ms.
Izquierdo’s evidence where it conflicts with Mr. Mimbela’s evidence, and I take
into account the evidence of H and D which serves to provide some corroboration
of Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence.  Also, Mr. Mimbela agreed that he did have a Jeep
and a Toyota vehicle, which were the vehicles identified by Ms. Izquierdo that
Mr. Mimbela drove first to the air base and then to Lima.
[284]                         
Finally, it is noteworthy that after failing to put this incident
to Ms. Izquierdo when she first testified, that Mr. Berendson, while
cross-examining Ms. Izquierdo during her reply evidence, elected not to
cross-examine Ms. Izquierdo on her reply testimony regarding this incident.
[285]                         
The child was less than one year old when the parties separated;
there is no dispute that Ms. Izquierdo has been the child’s primary caregiver. 
As a result of various court orders made in Peru, discussed previously, Mr.
Berendson had a schedule of parenting time that in large measure was
facilitated through the ongoing involvement of the child’s paternal grandmother
with whom Ms. Izquierdo always maintained a positive and congenial
relationship.  This was the situation while Ms. Izquierdo and the child lived
in Piura and later in Lima.
[286]                         
I am satisfied on the evidence that the child usually would go to
the maternal grandmother’s residence where Mr. Berendson would spend parenting
time with the child.  That was usually the case while Ms. Izquierdo lived in
Piura.  Ms. Izquierdo testified that Mr. Berendson did not exercise overnight
parenting time and Mr. Berendson did not disagree with this evidence during his
testimony.  During his meeting with the OCL, Mr. Berendson agreed that there
were no overnights since 2014; he claimed that he was not “permitted” to have overnights,
and his reason for that was that he “just never changed it.”[76]
[287]                         
Mr. Berendson described Ms. Izquierdo’s pregnancy as being
high-risk and gave detailed evidence regarding the lengthy trip to Lima with
Ms. Izquierdo, and also D, to ensure that Ms. Izquierdo received the best
medical care during the child’s birth.  Both parties were proud parents,
thrilled with the arrival of their son.  Mr. Berendson was a proud father for
the first time.
[288]                         
The evidence established that the child did enjoy various
activities with Mr. Berendson.  Mr. Berendson provided descriptions of these
numerous activities with the child during his parenting time, and I accept Mr.
Berendson’s evidence.  Ms. Izquierdo also confirmed that there were visits that
the child enjoyed.
[289]                         
Mr. Berendson described in detail his visit at the child’s school
in Lima in October 2018 and the child’s enthusiasm on seeing his father at the
school and introducing his father to his classmates.  Mr. Berendson’s
attendance at the school was a surprise to the child and was made without Ms.
Izquierdo’s knowledge.  However, that does not diminish the child’s
enthusiastic response when he saw his father.  Although I am satisfied with Mr.
Berendson’s testimony regarding this school visit, Mr. Berendson also provided
a video of that visit which was filed as an exhibit[77]
and corroborated his testimony.
[290]                         
Notwithstanding the child-focused and positive visits that took
place, there was significant evidence in this trial regarding Mr. Berendson
bringing the police when he came to pick up the child.  This was very upsetting
to the child.  It scared him.  The extent of Mr. Berendson’s use of the police
cannot be overstated – it was significant.  As some corroboration, in the
petition previously referred to filed by the Ministry of Women and Vulnerable
Population, there is a reference to 158 “police verifications.”[78]
[291]                         
Ms. Izquierdo described the child’s reaction to the police being
present.  The child would become nervous, he would run around and squeeze his
hands.
[292]                         
J described the child as being scared, asking not to bring the
police.  J testified that Mr. Berendson would state in front of the police that
he had attended to pick up the child earlier but that no one was home, so he
returned with the police.  However, Mr. Berendson had not been there
previously, rather he arrived initially with the police.  I accept J’s evidence
in that regard.
[293]                         
When Mr. Berendson arrived with the police, J described Mr.
Berendson as yelling and making fun of her and always video recording.  Ms.
Izquierdo also testified about the constant video recording by Mr. Berendson.
[294]                         
J mentioned occasions when she was in Piura that she would be
home, and her mother would be at work.  She did deliver the child to Mr.
Berendson for his visit, but she described the child as angry and not wanting
to go.
[295]                         
After Ms. Izquierdo moved to Lima, given the approximate 1,000 kilometre
distance from Piura where Mr. Berendson resided, there were ongoing issues
regarding Mr. Berendson’s parenting time.  I find as a fact that Mr. Berendson
had a habit of just showing up at Ms. Izquierdo’s home, with no advance notice
to Ms. Izquierdo, on one of his scheduled visitation dates.  The regular
parenting-time schedule no longer made sense given the distance between the
parties; however, Mr. Berendson would arrive unannounced, frequently with the
police, demanding his scheduled parenting time.
[296]                         
J explained there were occasions when she would be at home in
Lima and Mr. Berendson would arrive without notice.  He would ring the doorbell
incessantly, and that if the child was not there, he would return with the
police.  This also occurred on days that were not Mr. Berendson’s scheduled
parenting time.
[297]                         
For his part, Mr. Berendson denied yelling and other
inappropriate behaviours attributed to him when attending for parenting time. 
I prefer the evidence of Ms. Izquierdo and J where it conflicts with Mr.
Berendson’s evidence on this issue.
[298]                         
I find that Mr. Berendson used the police to create a record of
alleged non-compliance with court orders when he attended at Mr. Izquierdo’s
residence in Lima without any prior notice regarding his intention to exercise
his parenting time.
[299]                         
Over the years there were occasions when Ms. Izquierdo failed to
have the child available for visits; Ms. Izquierdo agreed she had been ordered
to ensure compliance with the parenting schedule.  However, the vast majority
of the chaos and police presence at parenting-time exchanges was orchestrated
deliberately by Mr. Berendson and was not in the child’s best interests.
[300]                         
As in Piura, a number of successful visits occurred in Lima
including when arrangements were made between Ms. Izquierdo and the paternal
grandmother.  However, the positive visits that occurred when Ms. Izquierdo was
aware that Mr. Berendson was attending to exercise parenting time did not erase
from the child’s memory the frightening and ongoing episodes when the police
were present.
[301]                         
Despite credible evidence to the contrary, Mr. Berendson testified
without equivocation that the child was not afraid of the police.  In support
of this conclusion, Mr. Berendson testified about an occurrence in 2017 in
Lima.  I accept Mr. Berendson’s evidence that he attended at Ms. Izquierdo’s
apartment to exercise parenting time but that Ms. Izquierdo and the child were
not home.  Mr. Berendson went to the police station and while returning with
the police officer, walking on the sidewalk, Ms. Izquierdo pulled up in her
vehicle and stopped.  The child was in the vehicle in the back seat and Ms.
Izquierdo’s mother was in the front seat.  The child willingly held out his
arms so that the police officer could lift the child out of the car through the
window and place the child on the sidewalk.  The child displayed no apprehension
at the presence of the police officer and the child reacted affectionately
towards Mr. Berendson.  At Mr. Berendson’s request, the video of this event was
marked as an exhibit.[79] 
Although the video corroborates Mr. Berendson’s testimony, I do not view the
video as necessary evidence because I was satisfied with Mr. Berendson’s oral
testimony.
[302]                         
The circumstances of this occasion, where the child was
comfortable in the car with his mother and maternal grandmother and did not
react negatively when seeing the police officer, do not retract from, or
undermine, the significant probative evidence of the child’s emotional upset
and angst because of police presence.  Further, the child’s negative reaction
to seeing police was part of the child’s disclosure to the OCL during
interviews, as discussed in more detail later in these reasons.
[303]                         
Ms. Izquierdo gave examples of the child’s behaviour during
occasions in Peru when the child would refuse to attend a visit with Mr.
Berendson.  This would occur for example on occasions when the paternal
grandmother was not present.  The child would yell, cry and hang on to Ms.
Izquierdo; he would say he did not want to go and would lean against the wall,
his face covered by his hands while screaming; the child’s upset would lead to
the child hitting both himself and Ms. Izquierdo.  Mr. Berendson was described
as being at the door witnessing this behaviour.  There was no credible evidence
from Mr. Berendson disputing this testimony about the child’s behaviour.  I
accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence.  Further, as noted later in these reasons, the
same behaviour was witnessed by staff at the supervised access centre in
London, Ontario.
[304]                         
I also accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that while in Peru she
arranged for the child to have therapy to assist him in dealing with these
behaviours.
[305]                         
I address an issue regarding blood tests.  Although Ms. Izquierdo
was responsible for the child’s healthcare, there is evidence that Mr.
Berendson, without notice to Ms. Izquierdo, took the child for blood tests
under the pretext that the child was not being fed properly.  I am satisfied on
the evidence that Ms. Izquierdo always was attentive to the child’s healthcare
including nutrition; and that this unilateral conduct by Mr. Berendson, which
caused upset to the child, was neither necessary nor in the child’s best
interests.
[306]                         
There were a number of orders made during the Hague application
that provided for Mr. Berendson to have parenting time with the child either in-person
on a supervised basis, or remotely by way of video or telephone calls with some
of those calls being supervised.[80] 
The first order[81]
that was made in the Hague application provided for remote parenting
time before Mr. Berendson had arrived in Canada.  All of the in-person supervised
visits are best described as dismal failures due to the child’s absolute
refusal to participate in the visits despite the efforts of Ms. Izquierdo (when
she was present) and the supervisor urging the child to participate.
[307]                         
There were six attempts at in-person supervised visits.  The
first three visits were supervised by Brayden Services Inc. (“Brayden”) during
the Hague application trial, and the last three visits were supervised
by Merrymount Family Support and Crisis Centre (“Merrymount”) following the
release of the trial decision in the Hague application.  The evidence
regarding the in-person supervised visits included the reports from Brayden[82]
and Merrymount[83]
filed as business records.  A Spanish language interpreter was present for the
Merrymount visits and the supervisor for the Brayden visits spoke Spanish.
[308]                         
The first two Brayden visits were scheduled to occur at a
restaurant and the third visit was to occur at a bowling alley.  For all three
visits the child’s refusal to participate in the visits reached such a
heightened level that the supervisor decided against further attempts to force
the visit.  During the visits the child engaged in escalating emotional
behaviour including crying and screaming.  There was no actual engagement
between the child and Mr. Berendson except during the second visit in the
restaurant.
[309]                         
During that visit, the child attended with the mother’s partner. 
While the child was inside the restaurant, Mr. Berendson walked in and the
child started screaming that he did not want to see Mr. Berendson and for Mr.
Berendson to get out.  Mr. Berendson attempted to approach the child showing
him some gifts that he brought but the child began walking around the
restaurant moving chairs and flipping some chairs to the floor.  Throughout the
child was described as escalating and screaming without stopping, prompting the
supervisor to end the visit.
[310]                         
Regarding this visit, during cross-examination by the OCL, it was
suggested to Mr. Berendson that the child started overturning tables and chairs. 
Mr. Berendson responded that that never happened.  He did acknowledge that the
child was upset and added “… he did not flip tables or nothing.”  Mr. Berendson
also disagreed with the suggestion that the child was “out of control”,
responding that the child “was just not being him.”  This evidence contradicts
Mr. Berendson’s description during his interview with the OCL where Mr.
Berendson described the child as “out of control” and “kicking chairs trying to
flip tables.”[84] 
I find that at trial, Mr. Berendson deliberately minimized the extent of the
child’s behaviour on that occasion.  Mr. Berendson’s evidence was not credible. 
Further, Mr. Berendson’s trial testimony is contradicted by the Braydon notes.
[311]                         
During the three attempted visits at Merrymount, it was not
possible to have the child engage at all with Mr. Berendson who was waiting in
a different area of the building.  Ms. Izquierdo brought the child each time. 
Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence is corroborated by the Merrymount notes.  The child’s
behaviours included refusing to enter the building, screaming, including on one
occasion prolonged crying and screaming, running out of the building and
hitting Ms. Izquierdo.
[312]                         
I accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that she encouraged the child
to attend the in-person visits.  She reassured the child that he would not be
alone and that he would enjoy the visit.  In attempting to minimize the child’s
anxiety, on some occasions the child was not told in advance that he was going
to a visit.  Nothing worked.  The child’s aversion to in-person visits was
resolute.  No amount of reasoning or persuasion, including by the supervisor,
had any affect.
[313]                         
Ms. Izquierdo described in detail her efforts to assist the child
by arranging therapy for the child in London.  The child attended for a number
of appointments.  The purpose for the therapy included assisting the child in
dealing with his anxiety regarding visits with his father, including virtual
visits.  Ms. Izquierdo testified that the child, as a result of anxiety regarding
the visits, engaged in aggressive behaviour and suffered physical symptoms such
as ticks and blinking of his eyes.  On one occasion the child said he wanted to
kill himself.  Those were additional reasons for arranging therapy for the
child.  Ms. Izquierdo was able to access some subsidies for the therapy, but at
times she had to pay some of the costs herself.  There was no financial
assistance from Mr. Berendson for the therapy expense.  Following an attempted
visit, the child would display anger at Ms. Izquierdo and would accuse her of
lying to him about going to the visit.
[314]                         
Regarding the video and telephone calls, those efforts at
parenting time generally did not go well.  The child was resistive and
reluctant.  If Mr. Berendson called, and the phone was handed to the child, he
would move away or throw the phone.  I accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that she
took all reasonable measures to facilitate calls between the child and Mr.
Berendson.  Ms. Izquierdo did describe a few calls between the child and the
paternal grandmother that were cordial.
[315]                         
While the evidence was unclear as to how long the calls
continued, Ms. Izquierdo estimated that the calls continued for two months. 
During his interview with the OCL, Mr. Berendson referred to the calls as not
being pleasant, and that the child would refuse to talk to him. [85]
[316]                         
In compliance with the directive in the Hague appeal
decision regarding involvement of the OCL, the case management judge made an
order[86]
requiring the involvement of the OCL.  The file was accepted by the OCL via
appointment of counsel and a clinician to assist OCL counsel.  The clinician
was assigned to this case in October 2022.
[317]                         
The role of the OCL in this case included assisting the court in
providing evidence regarding the child’s views and preferences.  The OCL
clinician’s evidence consisted of two affidavits[87]
that summarized the interviews with the child and the parties.  As noted
earlier, the clinician also testified at trial remotely.  As a result of some
issues raised on behalf of Mr. Berendson, the clinician’s first affidavit was
redacted to eliminate a number of paragraphs, and it is the redacted affidavit
that the court relies on.
[318]                         
The child was interviewed on four occasions[88],
the last time being approximately three months prior to the commencement of
trial.  Following a voire dire, a ruling was made that statements made
by the child to the OCL clinician, and also to OCL counsel who was present at
all interviews, were admissible as to the truth of the facts contained in the
statements, based on necessity and threshold reliability.  Absent this ruling,
however, statements made by the child to the OCL indicative of the child’s
state of mind would be admissible as an exception to hearsay rule: Ward v.
Swan, 2009 CanLII 22551 (ON SC), 2009 CarswellOnt 2435 (Ont. S.C.J.), at paras. 4-8.
[319]                         
I am satisfied that the clinician’s evidence as to statements
made by the child, and also statements made by each of the parents, to the
clinician, was accurate and reliable based on the clinician’s methods and
protocol followed during the interviews.
[320]                         
The clinician’s evidence was credible and reliable.  Mr.
Berendson’s thorough cross-examination of the clinician did not weaken or call
into question the clinician’s evidence as to the child’s views and preferences
or the clinician’s evidence as to the accuracy of the statements made to the
clinician by the child and the parents.
[321]                         
By way of context the child was age six (nearly age seven) when
he left Peru.  He was almost age 11 when last interviewed by the OCL.  The
child had been in Canada for approximately four-and-a-half years when this
trial started.
[322]                         
The clinician’s evidence supports the following findings which I
make:
[323]                         
I am satisfied by the evidence, and I find that the child’s
expressed views and preferences are strong, reliable, independent and genuine,
and are in entitled to weight.
[324]                         
There can be no doubt that both parents have a deep love and
affection for the child.  Mr. Berendson during his interview with the OCL
described the child as very clever and born gifted.  Ms. Izquierdo testified
that the child is very kind, loving and a good friend.  The child did not speak
English when he arrived in Canada but now speaks English “perfectly.”
[325]                         
Ms. Izquierdo further testified that the child is doing well in
school; that he likes science but is having some issues with math and Ms.
Izquierdo spoke about arranging some assistance to help the child with his
math.  The child enjoys his friends and playing soccer.
[326]                         
Ms. Izquierdo has been the subject of police “wellness checks” in
London at the behest of Mr. Berendson.  He did admit that he made those requests;
however, during his evidence, Mr. Berendson could articulate no specific,
credible reason for his wellness-check requests.  Ms. Izquierdo testified that
on one occasion, the police attended at 1:30 in the morning and that the child
was asleep and woke up when the police attended.  While Ms. Izquierdo described
the police as being very kind and then leaving, the child was scared.
[327]                         
It is notable that the child independently recollected this
occurrence, telling the OCL that his father caused the police to check on him
in the middle of the night.  This scared the child; it made him angry and he
wants his father to leave him alone.
[328]                         
I find that Mr. Berendson’s requests for police wellness checks
constituted blatant harassment.  Furthermore, from the child’s perspective
after having endured years of police attendances at his home in Peru initiated
by Mr. Berendson, it would have been particularly traumatic and upsetting for
the child now to endure similar harassment in London, Ontario.
[329]                         
It was also Ms. Izquierdo’s uncontradicted evidence that Mr.
Berendson complained to the children’s aid society.  As a result, there were
several visits by the society.  An investigation was started.  The society
interviewed the child, the mother and her partner and went to their home.  Following
the society investigation, no court case was started and no further action was
taken.  There was no credible evidence from Mr. Berendson or anyone else
providing a reasonable explanation as to why Mr. Berendson contacted the
society.
[330]                         
Mr. Berendson left messages to the child, in Spanish, by hanging
a large coloured poster in a park together with a balloon, by writing a message
on the back of a street sign[89]
and by writing a message on a white board located outside of a local
restaurant.  Ms. Izquierdo described the restaurant sign as being white and
that the message was written with a marker.  Mr. Berendson published a photo of
the poster in the park on his Twitter account[90]
after the date of the social media order.  It was not in dispute that Mr.
Berendson wrote the three messages.
[331]                         
I accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that the location of all three
messages was within a block of where she and the child were residing in London
at the time.  I also accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that on one occasion she
saw Mr. Berendson, on the street, outside of her home.
[332]                         
During cross-examination by the OCL, Ms. Izquierdo detailed the
child’s reactions after seeing the three messages.  The child was described as
being anxious, anguished and nervous.  Physically, the child’s face turned red,
he spoke nervously, he grabbed Ms. Izquierdo’s hand wanting to leave and the
child did not want to go outside.
[333]                         
Mr. Berendson testified that he did not know where the child was
living at the time when he left the messages.  He agreed he did not leave such
messages elsewhere in the city.  When pressed by the OCL during
cross-examination, Mr. Berendson denied that he knew where the child lived or
the area where the child resided.  Mr. Berendson also denied the suggestion
that he put the messages where did so that the child would see them.  When
asked to explain why he chose those locations, Mr. Berendson’s sarcastic
response was “… because I love the area.”
[334]                         
Mr. Berendson’s denials and evidence are not credible.  I do not
believe his evidence.  In the past Mr. Berendson had hired private
investigators to locate Ms. Izquierdo after she left Peru with the child.  It
defies belief that Mr. Berendson left the messages where he did without knowing
where the child lived, or at least without knowing that the child lived within
that vicinity.  Mr. Berendson’s purpose in placing the messages where he did
was to ensure that the child saw them.  The messages were directed specifically
to his son, including, in Spanish, that “daddy loves you” and referring to the
child in Spanish by his nickname.  Mr. Berendson gave no consideration as to
how the child might be affected by seeing the messages given the child’s past negative
reactions to the attempts to implement parenting time, in particular in-person
parenting time in London, as discussed earlier.
[335]                         
Mr. Berendson’s position includes an argument that the Peruvian
courts retain jurisdiction.  He relies on s. 41 of the Children’s Law Reform
Act and submits that this court should recognize the Peruvian order made by
the appellate court (“the Peruvian order”) on April 17, 2019 (together with
corrections in the two subsequent orders)[91]
as discussed earlier.  Section 41 states:
[336]                         
Throughout this trial, there was evidence that Mr. Berendson
continued to litigate parenting issues in Peru.  Ms. Izquierdo sought an order
in Peru that the court proceeding should be discontinued on the basis that Mr.
Berendson’s Hague application was dismissed, that there is currently an
ongoing parenting proceeding in Ontario and relying on the current circumstances
and the length of time both parties and the child have been in Ontario.  Ms.
Izquierdo’s request to terminate the proceeding in Peru was dismissed by the
Peruvian court on January 25, 2024.[92]
[337]                         
Mr. Berendson’s position during the trial that the Peruvian
courts have jurisdiction and that this court should recognize the Peruvian
order requires some scrutiny.
[338]                         
In his answer[93]
Mr. Berendson pleads specifically that he will not challenge that the child’s
habitual place of residence is London, Ontario.
[339]                         
Mr. Berendson in his answer requested that the Peruvian order
“for joint custody” be recognized and enforced pursuant to s. 41.  However, Mr.
Berendson then requests a regular parenting schedule where the child spends a
week-about with each parent.  This was not the visitation schedule contained in
the Peruvian order where the regular parenting schedule included three hours on
Tuesdays and Thursdays and alternate weekends on Saturdays and Sundays.
[340]                         
During his testimony Mr. Berendson expanded his request asking
that the child be placed with him for 60 to 90 days isolated from the
“abducting party.”
[341]                         
During the fairly intensive case management process, the numerous
endorsements that were made by the case management judge included:
[342]                         
The foregoing suggests that Mr. Berendson seeks an order to
recognize part of the Peruvian order, being the portion relating to custody but
that he seeks a different order than the Peruvian order regarding parenting
time.  Further, it is noted that the Peruvian order is temporary.
[343]                         
It is important not to conflate s. 41 with the issue of
jurisdiction.  In the Hague appeal decision, the Court of Appeal for
Ontario[96]
as discussed earlier, made clear that the court must now decide parenting
issues: see paras. 5, 13, 38, 39 and 50, and in particular para. 13 states:
[344]                         
In addition, I would note the following:
[345]                         
The issue relating to s. 41 turns on whether this court, in exercising
its jurisdiction in deciding the parenting issues, should recognize the
Peruvian order.
[346]                         
The OCL submits that it is an abuse of process for a parent to
seek recognition of an extra-provincial order under s. 41 after that parent’s
application under the Hague Convention (incorporated at para. 46 of the CLRA)
has been dismissed.  The applicant adopts the OCL’s submission.
[347]                         
The authorities relied on by the OCL include:
[348]                         
I concur with the OCL’s submission that Mr. Berendson’s claim
under s. 41, in the face of a dismissal of the Hague application, constitutes
re-litigation and amounts to an abuse of process.
[349]                         
Alternatively, even if s. 41 was available to Mr. Berendson, then
pursuant to s. 42 a court may supersede an extra-provincial order.  Section 42
states:
[350]                         
In the present case, there has been a material change in
circumstances since the Peruvian order and the condition in s. 42(1)(a) is
met.  Even if the child was not habitually resident in Ontario, then all the
conditions in s. 42(1)(b)(i)-(v) are satisfied.
[351]                         
While I make no order under s. 41, I do take into account and
consider the Peruvian order.
[352]                         
As noted earlier, the Children’s Law Reform Act, is the applicable
legislation in this case.  When making a parenting order s. 24 requires the
court to take into account only the best interests of the child, requires the
court to give primary consideration to the child’s physical, emotional and
psychological safety, security and well-being and sets out the factors that the
court shall consider relating to the circumstances of the child.
[353]                         
For convenience, sections 24(1), (2), and (3) are reproduced:
[354]                         
The court is required to take into account the impact of family
violence: s. 24(3)(j).  In doing so, the factors listed in s. 24(4) shall be
considered:
[355]                         
For almost his entire life, the child has lived in the shadow of
non-stop litigation, both in Peru and Ontario.  While in Peru the child was
subjected to various interviews and assessments.  At this point, the child’s
needs include: the continuation of a stable home life; preservation of his
emotional and psychological safety by being able to function as a child, go to
school, pursue friendships and play sports without the constant pressure and
anxiety regarding the issue of Mr. Berendson’s requests for parenting time;
being able to enjoy his day-to-day life without fear for his safety; this means
being able to enjoy a walk in the park, going to a restaurant or walking along
the sidewalk without being startled by messages directed at the child on
posters or messages written on restaurant bill boards or scrawled on the back
of street signs; this means being able to go to school without being
stigmatized by the implementation of a safety plan; and this means not having
to leave his home and missing school and go to a hotel because of frightening
and disturbing messages sent to the court after midnight.
[356]                         
The child’s needs include a right to privacy, and a right to live
his life without an incessant barrage of social media about himself or his
family.
[357]                         
The child’s needs must be formulated, “given the child’s age and
stage of development”: s. 24(3)(a).  Having attained age 11 prior to the
commencement of this trial, the child’s needs must reflect an appropriate
degree of autonomy for the child to make decisions that affect his life.  The
extent of the child’s right to autonomy will include a consideration of what
the child has witnessed, the behaviour that he has been subjected to and the
effects of that behaviour on the child.
[358]                         
As discussed previously, Ms. Izquierdo has been the child’s
primary caregiver.  The relationship between the child and Ms. Izquierdo is a
strong and loving parent-child relationship.  The child has good sibling
relationships with his half-siblings, and in particular, there is a strong bond
between the child and his sister, J.  The child always enjoyed a relationship
with his paternal grandmother and Ms. Izquierdo promoted the child’s
relationship with the paternal family, especially with the paternal grandmother
as discussed earlier.
[359]                         
While Mr. Berendson did participate in the child’s care prior to
separation, the child was very young when the parties separated.  Mr. Berendson
maintained his relationship with the child following separation, but as
discussed earlier, Mr. Berendson’s conduct had significant negative
repercussions for the child which affected his relationship with Mr. Berendson.
[360]                         
Mr. Berendson’s parenting time with the child was more regular
and frequent while both parties lived in Piura.  After Ms. Izquierdo and the
child moved to Lima, while it is not entirely clear from either party’s evidence
as to the frequency of the parenting time actually exercised by Mr. Berendson,
I can and do conclude that it was sporadic and not particularly frequent
because of the distance.  Regarding the parties’ conflicting evidence as to
when Ms. Izquierdo notified Mr. Berendson regarding her new address, I prefer
and accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence.  I find that she notified Mr. Berendson
and the court promptly of her address in Lima.  Ms. Izquierdo then commenced a
proceeding on March 1, 2017 to vary the existing visitation regime.[98]
[361]                         
There was conflicting evidence regarding the extent of
cooperation in relation to Mr. Berendson’s parenting time.  Mr. Berendson’s
evidence suggested that Ms. Izquierdo was not cooperative, and that he had
difficulty seeing the child with gaps at times of several months.  Mr.
Berendson was critical especially of the frequency of visits during the first
year post separation.
[362]                         
I prefer Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence where it conflicts with Mr.
Berendson’s evidence.  I find that Ms. Izquierdo was far more reasonable in
creating a positive atmosphere where Mr. Berendson was able to exercise
parenting time.  In particular, in Piura, the parenting time was facilitated
through the paternal grandmother, as discussed previously.  This was because of
the conciliation agreement and a subsequent court order.  Ms. Izquierdo was
flexible regarding parenting time, including permitting Mr. Berendson to spend
time with the child outside of the scheduled parenting time.  Ms. Izquierdo
described frustration at her unsuccessful attempts to engage Mr. Berendson to
create a constructive atmosphere regarding the parenting-time schedule.  Ms.
Izquierdo complained, for example, that Mr. Berendson would fail to respond to
her email communications.
[363]                         
Mr. Berendson would insist unreasonably that Ms. Izquierdo had to
be personally present when he came to pick up the child, causing her to have to
rush home early from work.
[364]                         
Mr. Berendson failed to demonstrate flexibility around Ms.
Izquierdo’s schedule.  On one occasion, in 2016, Ms. Izquierdo gave notice to
Mr. Berendson that she would not be home on his scheduled weekend as she had
made arrangements for a friend to visit and they would spend the weekend at the
beach.  Ms. Izquierdo offered for Mr. Berendson to come to the beach to see the
child during the weekend.  His family beach house was close by.  Instead, and
without responding to Ms. Izquierdo’s request, Mr. Berendson attended at her
home with police and a journalist shortly after Ms. Izquierdo had returned
picking up her friend from the airport.  Mr. Berendson claimed that Ms.
Izquierdo was in breach of the order and the story was publicized in the news
and including on the radio.  This caused embarrassment and anguish to Ms.
Izquierdo.
[365]                         
I accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence regarding this incident. 
Further there was little, if any, evidence from Mr. Berendson regarding this
incident.
[366]                         
The obligation of a parent to support the development and
maintenance of the child’s relationship with the other parent would include
treating the other parent with dignity and respect.  Mr. Berendson failed to do
this as demonstrated by the history of family violence that he perpetrated.
[367]                         
Mr. Berendson argues that Ms. Izquierdo is a child abductor and
that her conduct has deprived Mr. Berendson of maintaining a relationship with
the child.  That analysis on the particular facts of this case is flawed.  I
deal with this issue later in these reasons.
[368]                         
The child’s views and preferences have been addressed previously.
[369]                         
The matter of the child’s heritage was not a significant issue.  As
noted earlier, both parties were born and raised in Peru and Spanish is their
first language.  Mr. Berendson in particular was passionate when he described
some historical events regarding Peru.
[370]                         
Both parties recognize the importance of the child to know and
appreciate his heritage.  There is no credible suggestion in the evidence that
Ms. Izquierdo, as the child’s primary caregiver, has failed to promote the
child’s heritage, including during the years that the child has been in Canada.
[371]                         
The specific orders sought by both parties were summarized
previously and need not be repeated.
[372]                         
Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence focused on the child continuing to be in
her primary care without any specified parenting time in favour of Mr.
Berendson except on the child’s initiative and consent.  Ms. Izquierdo
testified that it was best for the child to gain confidence, to be allowed to
recover emotionally and that he needs time to enjoy a normal childhood.  Ms.
Izquierdo indicated that the child currently is receiving therapy.  Ms.
Izquierdo summarized her situation at the conclusion of her evidence-in-chief. 
Her testimony included that she and the child suffered damage by Mr. Berendson’s
“merciless persecution”; that she and her family require protection from Mr.
Berendson; and that she did everything possible to protect her child from the
“malice” of Mr. Berendson while in Peru, and that she had to flee her country together
with her child; and that she has ongoing fear for the safety of herself and the
child.
[373]                         
Ms. Izquierdo’s plan for herself and the child is to remain in
Canada, describing their status as permanent residents.
[374]                         
Mr. Berendson’s plan as articulated in his evidence-in-chief, was
to implement meaningful time for the child to spend with his father.  As a
means of accomplishing this, Mr. Berendson, as noted earlier, suggested an
order requiring the child to be isolated for a period of 60 to 90 days from the
“abducting party.”  This will, according to Mr. Berendson “… allow enough time
for father and son to recover the magic that he always had prior to the
abduction.”  During this time, Mr. Berendson would not prevent the child from
seeing his friends in Canada and Peru.
[375]                         
In explaining his plan, Mr. Berendson’s enthusiasm was palpable,
stating “I can’t wait to see what he has to tell me.”  Mr. Berendson continued
that he “can’t wait” to see how comfortable the child would be, and that Mr.
Berendson could help the child with his homework including math.
[376]                         
Mr. Berendson’s espousal of this somewhat idyllic reunion of
father and son was after hearing the OCL clinician’s evidence as to the child’s
views and preferences, and well after the catastrophic attempts to implement in-person
parenting time described earlier in these reasons.  Nevertheless, Mr. Berendson
was undaunted testifying that the child “… might whine and cry one day because
it’s going to be difficult.  He will then be set free.”
[377]                         
Considering that the child was observed flipping chairs in a
restaurant while screaming when he last saw Mr. Berendson, there were no
child-focused suggestions from Mr. Berendson as to how he would implement his
plan should the child show resistance to living with Mr. Berendson during the
proposed period of isolation from Ms. Izquierdo.
[378]                         
From Mr. Berendson’s perspective, a therapeutic approach did not
seem to find any favour.  Although Mr. Berendson posited a therapeutic approach
to Ms. Izquierdo during his cross-examination of her, Mr. Berendson’s position
later during his examination-in-chief was that an appropriate court order could
achieve the necessary result of restoring the father/son relationship, and that
this could be done “… without the need to spend a lot of money on so-called
family therapists.”
[379]                         
Mr. Berendson’s plan that the child will be “set free” following
a forced period of isolation is not a plan rooted in the child’s best interests
– rather it is a plan that is more likely inimical to the child’s best
interests.  The aspects of Mr. Berendson’s plan as discussed in his pleadings,
his position that Peru has jurisdiction and his position that the Peruvian
orders should be enforced pursuant to s. 41 of the Children’s Law Reform Act,
have been discussed elsewhere in these reasons and are not repeated here.
[380]                         
Mr. Berendson has made a refugee claim and his stated intention
during his evidence was to remain in Canada.  For a number of years following
his arrival in Canada, Mr. Berendson did not make any refugee claim.  He agreed
that initially his status was that of a visitor.
[381]                         
Mr. Berendson during this case has not been forthcoming in
confirming his status in Canada, and consequently, the case management judge
had to make an order in June 2023[99]
requiring Mr. Berendson to provide proof of his status in Canada, including
providing documents in relation to his refugee claim.
[382]                         
At trial Mr. Berendson’s situation was that he has made a refugee
claim, that the claim has been accepted, but that a decision regarding his
refugee claim is pending.  The evidence, including Mr. Berendson’s testimony,
suggests that he made his refugee claim during 2023, approximately three years
after his arrival in Canada as confirmed by a notice of seizure of his Peruvian
and German passports[100]
as part of the refugee claim process.
[383]                         
While the decision to approve Mr. Berendson’s refugee claim is
not within the jurisdiction of this court, it is notable that Mr. Berendson’s
parenting plan depends on him remaining in Canada.  During cross-examination by
the applicant’s counsel as to his refugee claim and any alleged risk Mr.
Berendson was facing in Peru, Mr. Berendson refused to provide details; he did
however state that when he left Peru his life was not at risk to his knowledge,
but his life is at risk now because while in Canada he had exposed a “mobster”
and his connections to cocaine trafficking in Peru.  The alleged “mobster” that
Mr. Berendson was referring to was Ms. Izquierdo’s partner.  It is important to
note that these allegations are bald assertions by Mr. Berendson without any
credible proof in this trial.
[384]                         
During OCL cross-examination, Mr. Berendson was asked where he
would live if his refugee application was not granted.  This prompted much
obfuscation and lack of responsiveness from Mr. Berendson as the
cross-examination continued.  Eventually Mr. Berendson made clear that he would
remain in Canada even if his refugee claim was denied, and he agreed that he
would do so until “forcibly removed.”  Implicit in Mr. Berendson’s evidence is
that he may defy an unfavourable decision regarding his refugee claim.
[385]                         
Mr. Berendson’s stated desire to remain in Canada is not
consistent with his counsel’s email in June 2023[101]
explaining Mr. Berendson’s desire to enter into discussions with the child to
be returned to Lima, Peru, and then ensuring the return of the child to Ontario
if the court in Peru decides that the child shall be residing with Ms. Izquierdo
in Ontario after a hearing in Peru.
[386]                         
While there is reliable evidence as to Ms. Izquierdo’s intention
to remain in Canada, Mr. Berendson’s plan to remain in Canada, at its best, is
less certain and may hinge on the outcome of his refugee claim.
[387]                         
The child’s needs discussed earlier in relation to s. 24(3)(a)
currently are being met by Ms. Izquierdo.  She is capable of continuing to meet
the child’s needs including maintaining contact with the paternal side of the
family.  While in Ontario, Ms. Izquierdo has taken all reasonable measures to
implement the court orders made in Ontario regarding parenting time, including
arranging therapy for the child.
[388]                         
Mr. Berendson lacks insight in identifying the child’s needs and Mr.
Berendson prioritizes his needs over the child’s needs.  As discussed in more
detail below in relation to family violence (s. 24(3)(j)), Mr. Berendson takes
no responsibility for the child’s refusal to have contact with him, nor does
Mr. Berendson acknowledge that the child has been adversely affected by his
conduct.
[389]                         
Currently, Mr. Berendson has failed to demonstrate that he is a
parent capable of understanding, prioritizing and promoting the child’s needs.
[390]                         
The willingness of the parties to cooperate and communicate with
each other on matters affecting the child has been broached earlier in relation
to s. 24(3)(d).
[391]                         
Notwithstanding Ms. Izquierdo’s reasonable efforts to foster a
better relationship between the parties, the prognosis regarding the parties’
ability to cooperate is poor.  The family violence that has permeated this
case, and its consequences including Ms. Izquierdo’s stated fear of Mr.
Berendson, forewarn against any reasonable expectation of cooperation between
the parents other than minor or peripheral matters.
[392]                         
The discussion of this factor incorporates the additional factors
listed in s. 24(4) that the court is required to consider in relation to cl.
3(j) when dealing with family violence.
[393]                         
The family violence perpetrated by Mr. Berendson in Peru includes
harassment, intimidation through social media, physical abuse, death threat
directed at Ms. Izquierdo, and family violence directed at Ms. Izquierdo’s now
adult children.  Mr. Berendson’s campaign of family violence was predatory and
it was serial, sustained and prolonged.  His behaviour was contumelious.  Mr.
Berendson weaponized his use of social media to target, threaten, intimidate
and harass his intended victims.  It is not hyperbole to say that Mr. Berendson
destroyed Ms. Izquierdo’s life as she knew it.  His physical abuse included breaking
Ms. Izquierdo’s finger causing a permanent injury.  Mr. Berendson demeaned Ms.
Izquierdo by his behaviour.  He subjected her to foul language and insults
including in the presence of the child and others.  Ensuring needless frequent
police attendances at her residence, and arranging for local and national news
coverage targeting Ms. Izquierdo and her family with baseless allegations, were
other methods employed by Mr. Berendson as tools of intimidation and
harassment.  Much of Mr. Berendson’s behaviour constitutes psychological abuse.
[394]                         
In Canada Mr. Berendson continued to use social media as a tool
of harassment and intimidation.  He ignored the social media order made by this
court.  Mr. Berendson used social media to target Mr. Izquierdo’s service
providers and this included perpetration of baseless immigration fraud allegations
against Mr. Izquierdo’s current trial counsel, and also another lawyer.  Mr.
Berendson used social media to target the child’s school and school principal. 
Mr. Berendson caused upset to the child by posting messages directed to the
child in three separate areas near the child’s residence, and then Mr.
Berendson lied to the court claiming he was unaware that the child lived in the
area.  In contravention of the social media order, Mr. Berendson posted a
picture of himself standing beside the poster in the park.  Mr. Berendson forced
the child endure needless police welfare checks.
[395]                         
The substantial evidentiary record in this lengthy trial laid
bare the serious extent to which Ms. Izquierdo, the child, and Ms. Izquierdo’s other
children were impacted by Mr. Berendson’s behaviour.
[396]                         
Focusing on the child, Mr. Berendson accepts no responsibility
for the child’s refusal to have contact with him.  During cross-examination by
the OCL, Mr. Berendson testified[102]:
[397]                         
Despite the overwhelming evidence to the contrary, Mr. Berendson,
inexplicably, refuses to accept that his behaviour has caused harm to the
people that the child loves.  Mr. Berendson testified[103]:
[398]                         
Later, in response to a similar question by the OCL, Mr.
Berendson testified[104]:
[399]                         
The foregoing excerpts are consistent with Mr. Berendson’s
testimony throughout the trial that he has done nothing to contribute to the
child’s refusal to see him.  During cross-examination, when the OCL broached
with Mr. Berendson whether he had considered writing a letter of apology to the
child, Mr. Berendson was adamant that he never apologizes for something that he
does not feel sorry for.  He added that this would be “a false apology”, which
is something he has not taught his son.
[400]                         
In absolving himself of any blameworthy behaviour, Mr. Berendson
sought to attribute blame to others for his estrangement from the child.  Mr.
Berendson claimed that the legal profession, and the “two grown-ups” who
brought the child to Canada, have succeeded in keeping the child away from him,
and that the judiciary is “following along” and “… does not see the light.”  During
one of the very limited occasions that Mr. Berendson elected to testify in
Spanish, he claimed that the “abductors’ lawyers have failed the court, that
they have failed the child and that the lawyers do not know the fundamental
rights of children.”
[401]                         
The family violence engaged in by Mr. Berendson raises concerns
about the safety of Ms. Izquierdo and the child based on issues relating to Mr.
Berendson’s mental and emotional health.  These concerns include the following:
[402]                         
I find that Mr. Berendson’s behaviour engages legitimate concerns
about the child’s safety being compromised; at its highest, Mr. Berendson’s
behaviour suggests the potential risk of harm to the child: ss. 24(4)(e), (f). 
These concerns flow from the death themes discussed above; from the statement
that kids should not come into the world; and from Mr. Berendson’s past mental-health
history including his lack of disclosure and honesty regarding that history.
[403]                         
In relation to Ms. Izquierdo, many of the foregoing factors in
relation to the child are relevant in concluding, as I do, that Mr. Berendson’s
conduct compromises the safety of Ms. Izquierdo.  I also take into account the
physical abuse and the death threat that Mr. Berendson perpetrated against Mr.
Izquierdo.  The family violence has caused Ms. Izquierdo legitimately to fear
for the safety of herself and the child: ss. 24(4)(f).
[404]                         
The court must consider any steps taken by Mr. Berendson to
prevent further family violence: s. 24(4)(g).  Mr. Berendson has rendered
himself incapable of taking such steps due to his intractable belief that his
conduct has not harmed the child, Ms. Izquierdo, her other children or anyone
else from the maternal family.
[405]                         
The family violence perpetrated by Mr. Berendson, coupled with
his denial of responsibility for any harm that he has caused, compromises Mr.
Berendson’s ability to care for the child and to meet the needs of the child. 
Given the foregoing, it would not be appropriate to place Ms. Izquierdo in a
position to either co-parent or co-operate with Mr. Berendson on issues
relating to the child; nor would such an order be in the child’s best interests.
[406]                         
As previously discussed, this court has made a restraining order
and also a social media order against Mr. Berendson.
[407]                         
In relation to the interim parenting orders, as discussed
previously, those orders were made during the Hague application.  It is
notable that all orders for in-person parenting time required supervision, and
that most of the orders for video calls or telephone calls also required
supervision.
[408]                         
Family violence is defined in s. 18(1) and s. 18(2) of the CLRA:
[409]                         
Children who are exposed to family violence are at risk of
emotional and behavioural problems throughout their lives.  Any suggestion that
family violence is unrelated to a perpetrator’s parenting ability is
untenable.  These principles were stated by the Supreme Court in Canada in Barendregt
v. Grebliunas, 2022 SCC 22, (S.C.C.), at para. 143:
[410]                         
Recent legislative amendments recognize that findings of family
violence are a critical consideration in the best interests analysis.  This was
stated in Barendregt at para. 146:
[411]                         
Although the Divorce Act was applicable in Barendregt, the
analysis in that case applies equally to cases governed by the Children’s Law
Reform Act as the relevant provisions in both statutes mirror each other.
[412]                         
Behaviour amounting to cyberbullying and social media postings
fall or can fall within the definition of family violence.  In McLellan v.
Birbilis, 2021 ONSC 7084 (Ont. S.C.J.), at para. 27, the court held that
the new definition of family violence does not preclude a finding that
cyberbullying falls within its meaning.  In S.B. v. J.I.U., 2021 ONCJ
614 (Ont. C.J.), the court stated at para. 38:
[413]                         
Unauthorized calls to authorities such as police and children’s
aid societies can constitute psychological abuse within the definition of
family violence: Dayboll v. Binag, 2022 ONSC 6510 (Ont. S.C.J.), at
para. 41(d).
[414]                         
Mr. Berendson in his written submissions relies on the “maximum
contact principle.”  The relevant statutory provision is similar in both the Divorce
Act and the CLRA.  Section 24(6) of the CLRA provides:
[415]                         
The authorities cited by Mr. Berendson include appellate
decisions where the failure to consider or apply the maximum contact principle
amounted to reversable error: B.V. v. P.V., 2012 ONCA 262 (Ont. C.A.),
at para. 15; Rigillo v. Rigillo, 2019 ONCA 548 (Ont. C.A.), at paras. 3,
9, 10.
[416]                         
When a parent seeks to restrict the other parent’s time with the
child, then the burden on that parent to adduce evidence increases – the
greater the restriction the greater the burden: see for example, Hameed v.
Hameed, 2006 ONCJ 274 (Ont. C. J.), at paras. 21-23, relied on by Mr.
Berendson.
[417]                         
In addressing the maximum contact principle, the Supreme Court of
Canada in Barendregt cautioned that some courts have interpreted this
principle as creating a presumption in favour of shared parenting arrangements,
equal parenting time, or regular access; that this tendency seems to imply that
as much contact with both parents as possible will necessarily be in the best
interests of the child.  These interpretations were described as overreaching
and that this principle is better referred to as the “parenting time factor.” 
In Barendregt, the court stated at paras. 134-135:
[418]                         
 A denial of parenting time is a remedy of last resort: Jafari
v. Dadar, 1996 CarswellNB 386 (New Brunswick Court of Queen’s Bench), at
para. 31.  In Jennings v. Garrett, 2004 CanLII 17126 (ON SC), 2004 CarswellOnt 2159 (Ont. S.C.J.),
Blishen J. reviewed the relevant jurisprudence and at para. 135 listed the
factors most commonly considered by the courts in terminating access (now
parenting time):
[419]                         
Factors 1, 2, 4 and 7 as listed by Blishen J. would be relevant
considerations in the present case.
[420]                         
While there is evidence that the child enjoyed visits with Mr.
Berendson in Peru, the evidentiary record as a whole must be considered in
determining a parenting order that is in the child’s best interests.
[421]                         
It is trite law that self-help remedies are not in a child’s best
interests and are not to be condoned.  Mr. Berendson’s position focuses on Mr.
Izquierdo as being a child abductor fleeing with the child to Canada; however,
his analysis stops there.
[422]                         
It is beyond the scope of the evidentiary record in this trial
for this court to delve into an analysis as to whether Ms. Izquierdo was
justified in her belief that the Peruvian courts could not adequately protect
her safety and that of the child.  This trial is about the parenting order to
be made in Ontario.  In assessing Ms. Izquierdo’s conduct, context is
important.  The context in this case is that Ms. Izquierdo was a victim of
systemic and prolonged family violence perpetrated by Mr. Berendson.
[423]                         
In this trial, Mr. Berendson focused on himself and not on the
child’s needs and best interests.  Mr. Berendson has closed the door on any
realistic therapeutic solution at this time by his ungovernable recalcitrance
to accept responsibility for the family violence he perpetrated and its effects
on the child, Ms. Izquierdo and other members of the maternal family.  Mr.
Berendson promoted a wide reach of his social media postings by his regular
practice of “tagging” others.
[424]                         
It is a fact established by the evidence that the child has been
affected emotionally by observing the effects of the grief suffered by his
mother and his half-siblings as a result of the family violence.  The child has
endured repetitive police attendances in Peru and also police welfare checks in
London, Ontario.
[425]                         
There is no credible evidence to suggest that the child will
react positively to spending parenting time with Mr. Berendson.  The attempts
at supervised in-person parenting time pursuant to interim orders of this
court, resulted in the child enduring severe emotional upset.  More of the same
is not in the child’s best interests, especially considering the child’s
extreme aversion, as he explained to the OCL, of having anything to do with his
father.
[426]                         
The evidence in this case is that Ms. Izquierdo made genuine
attempts to cooperate and foster a more congenial relationship with Mr.
Berendson regarding parenting their child while in Peru.  Those efforts were
rebuffed by Mr. Berendson.  Ms. Izquierdo took reasonable steps to comply with
the Ontario orders for the child to spend parenting time with Mr. Berendson. 
She enrolled the child in therapy; she accompanied the child to the in-person
visits and encouraged the child to spend time with Mr. Berendson.  Despite
these efforts, the child recoiled and engaged in sustained emotional
outbursts.
[427]                         
Mr. Berendson’s position that the child has been negatively
influenced by Ms. Izquierdo, or others, falls into the realm of speculation
unsupported by credible evidence.  In contrast, the child’s wishes to have no
contact with Mr. Berendson have been explained by the child to the OCL, and
have been explained by evidence relating to family violence and Mr. Berendson’s
conduct.
[428]                         
The reality for the child is that he lives in a digital world;
the child is not in isolation.  He can search the internet.  His friends too
can search the internet and find Mr. Berendson’s social media posts about the
child and his family.  The child’s friends then can tell the child what they
found.  They have done that.
[429]                         
Aside from the child’s refusal to have any contact with his
father, the issue of Mr. Berendson’s parenting time with the child must include
a consideration of the family violence to which Ms. Izquierdo and other family
members have been subjected.
[430]                         
The child’s best interests do not, and must not, include the
radical plan proposed by Mr. Berendson that requires placement of the child
with Mr. Berendson for 60-90 days isolated from Ms. Izquierdo and the maternal
family.
[431]                         
The evidence is overwhelming that it is in the child’s best
interests for Ms. Izquierdo to have sole decision-making responsibility for the
child, and full control of all aspects of his life, including travel and
obtaining and renewing government-issued documents, without having to obtain
Mr. Berendson’s consent.
[432]                         
Cases where an order provides for no parenting time with a parent
require a proper evidentiary basis.  This is such a case.  It is in the child’s
best interests for there to be no parenting time with Mr. Berendson but with
some exceptions as contained in the order below.
[433]                         
Regarding the sharing of information relating to the child, the
order below addresses that issue.  I do not find that it is in the child’s best
interests for all sharing of information to be controlled by the child as
advocated both by Ms. Izquierdo and the OCL.  The order below addresses that
issue.  Regarding communication between Mr. Berendson and the child, including
receiving gifts from Mr. Berendson, it is in the child’s best interests for
there to be some process to promote that, but with clear and strict parameters
as set out in the order below.
[434]                         
In terms of any change of address or relocation, Ms. Izquierdo
should have a wide but not unfettered discretion to change the child’s
principal place of residence.  Given the family violence issues, Ms. Izquierdo
shall not be required to disclose her address.  These matters are addressed in
the order below.  It is in the child’s best interests for the order to include
a prohibition against publicizing the child or members of his family or this
litigation through social media.  It is noteworthy that in this trial there was
no evidence of Ms. Izquierdo posting on social media about the child or the
court proceedings in Peru and Ontario.  Ms. Izquierdo testified that she
refrained from doing so in the interest of privacy.  Accordingly, it is not
necessary to make an order enjoining Ms. Izquierdo from publishing about the
child or the litigation affecting the child.
[435]                         
This has been a difficult and sad case.  Two parents and their
child find themselves in a new country far from their birthplace and their
homeland.  The broken relationship between the child and Mr. Berendson, if
repairable, would require much clinical intervention.  Mr. Berendson needs to
accept responsibility for his conduct and he must atone for his behaviour.  Mr.
Berendson is urged to seek the guidance of an experienced professional
therapist to assist him in these goals.  It would be critical for the therapist
to have an accurate understanding of the background, and Mr. Berendson must
ensure that the therapist has been provided with the reasons for judgment in
this case.  As part of any intervention Mr. Berendson also must ensure that the
therapist has thorough and accurate information about Mr. Berendson’s past
mental health history, including full and complete records of his mental health
treatment in Peru.
[436]                         
I address the issue of the s. 30 assessment required by the Hague
appeal decision.  While responsibility for the non-compliance with that order
rests with both parties, it is apparent on the evidence that Mr. Berendson had
access to more financial resources than did Ms. Izquierdo to fund an
assessment.  Mr. Berendson claimed that he made some inquiries and that an
assessment would cost in the range of $50,000.  It is difficult to accept this
evidence as Mr. Berendson provided no proof.  Mr. Berendson, however, did have
access to funds to hire lawyers and private investigators.  The significant
amount of money, as discussed later, that Mr. Berendson received from his
mother is shown as a loan in his financial statement.  However, Mr. Berendson
filed no proof that this non-arm’s length advance of funds is a loan subject to
repayment.  Mr. Berendson could have funded a reasonably-priced assessment had
he wanted to do so.  Instead, Mr. Berendson chose to use the money available to
him for other purposes.
[437]                         
When this trial commenced, it was important, and in the child’s
best interests, to avoid any further delay.  It was not in the child’s best
interests to adjourn the trial and make a s. 30 assessment order pending the
adjournment.  This would have entailed significant delay.  In addition, from
the vantage point of having had the benefit of all the evidence adduced at
trial, it is questionable whether an assessment would have assisted the court,
considering the dominance of the family violence issues that required the court
to assess credibility and make findings of fact.  Also noteworthy, is the
potential risk that the child may endure emotional upset during the assessment
process in having discussions about his father, similar to what was observed by
the OCL that caused the OCL to pause having meetings with the child.
[438]                         
Mr. Berendson placed significant emphasis on paragraph 43 in the Hague
appeal decision[112]
where the Court of Appeal for Ontario summarized the findings made by the
Superior Court of Piura Second Civil Court of Appeals dated April 17, 2019[113]
(this is the Peruvian appeal decision discussed earlier in these reasons).  The
summary in paragraph 43 includes that the Peruvian appeal court: found the
mother’s allegations to be unsubstantiated; made no mention of violence on the
father’s part, but that there had been violence on both sides; confirmed that
the various restraining orders (called “protection measures”) do not imply that
abuse was committed and do not suspend the father’s rights; and expressly
stated that it was determined that the father showed no signs of altered mental
status that may pose risks for the child and that the child wants his father to
visit him.
[439]                         
In paragraph 44, the Court of Appeal for Ontario stated that the Hague
application judge was not bound to treat these findings as determinative of the
situation as it existed at the time of the Hague application hearing.[114]
[440]                         
The evidence in this trial:
[441]                         
During her evidence-in-chief, Ms. Izquierdo testified that in
Peru there was no court hearing, similar to a trial, that she participated in,
where witnesses were present and gave oral testimony.  Mr. Berendson did not
dispute Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence on this point.  In reviewing the various
Peruvian decisions filed in this case, there frequently is reference to various
reports.  For example, the Peruvian court decision dated August 1, 2018 for
temporary shared custody (which was the subject of the Peruvian appeal decision
dated April 17, 2019), made numerous references to various reports, including
social services reports, psychological reports and police reports.  In
reviewing this decision, it is difficult to discern the presence of any trial
process where evidence was presented orally and subject to cross-examination.
[442]                         
Accordingly, in this trial and for reasons mentioned above, I do
not regard the findings made in the Peruvian appeal decision on April 17, 2019
as being in any way determinative of the situation as it exists now in this
trial over five years later.
[443]                         
I have considered the discussion as to the criteria for a
restraining order in McCall v. Res, 2013 ONCJ 254 (Ont. C.J.), at paras.
29-31 and the cases cited therein.  The evidence strongly supports the
conclusion that Ms. Izquierdo has reasonable grounds to fear for her safety and
that of the child based on the family violence perpetuated by Mr. Berendson.  Ms.
Izquierdo has satisfied me that a final restraining order should issue; further,
it should include Ms. Izquierdo’s partner.[116] 
The restraining order shall contain an exception as to any contact or
communication that may be contained in a parenting order.
[444]                         
It is noted that no request was made to include the social media
provisions as part of the restraining order; accordingly, the social media
provisions form part of the parenting order only.
[445]                         
I accept Mr. Berendson’s evidence regarding his education and
work history.  Mr. Berendson, particularly during his evidence-in-chief,
testified with a measure of alacrity, and his memory was quite impressive as to
the extent of detail that he provided.
[446]                         
Mr. Berendson described, with some measure of fondness and
emotion, his host family when he attended an exchange program for one year as a
high school student in New York state.  Mr. Berendson attended university in
Peru and obtained a bachelor’s degree in business.  He provided detailed
evidence regarding his time working in the food industry.  He worked in the United
States, including in Miami, for a large operation involving food exports.  Mr.
Berendson returned to Peru where he ran a large-scale operation dealing with
food exports.  Thereafter, Mr. Berendson resided in Japan where he worked in a
boat repair shop, following which Mr. Berendson lived in Europe for
approximately two years.  While there, Mr. Berendson testified that he worked
in a power generating plant.
[447]                         
After residing in Europe, Mr. Berendson returned to Peru and
continued to work there on a self-employed basis.  He was involved in various
pursuits including real estate business, repairing and selling pleasure boats
and buying and selling equipment such as compressors; at one point during his
evidence-in-chief Mr. Berendson analogized his business endeavors as “buy a car
– sell a car” and “buy a compressor – sell a compressor.”
[448]                         
It was evident from Mr. Berendson’s description of his family
including his grandparents, and his lifestyle and upbringing in Peru, that he
came from a family of some financial means.  Mr. Berendson testified for
example, about collecting rent for his grandmother and showing her properties
to potential tenants.
[449]                         
However, when Mr. Berendson was pushed during cross-examinations
for more specifics regarding his income and assets, his hitherto impressive
memory for detail began to falter.  The last three years that Mr. Berendson
worked was from 2017-2019 while still in Peru.  Mr. Berendson was asked what
was his income for 2017; for 2018; and for 2019.  Mr. Berendson always gave the
same answer: “I don’t remember.”
[450]                         
When asked about filing tax returns for those years in Peru, Mr.
Berendson testified that he did not file tax returns for 2017, 2018 and 2019. 
He explained that in Peru, tax returns are required to be filed if a person has
“a significant income.”  When asked what constitutes as significant income, Mr.
Berendson testified that he did not know the amount.  When Mr. Berendson was
asked to explain how he knew when to file a tax return if he did not know what
constituted a significant income, Mr. Berendson’s response shed no light on his
already convoluted testimony about filing tax returns in Peru.
[451]                         
In his most recent financial statement filed prior to trial[117],
Mr. Berendson disclosed current income from Ontario Works.  He disclosed very
negligible assets.  Regarding real estate, Mr. Berendson’s financial statement
stated only that his father died October 13, 2020 without leaving a will; the
value and amount of his real estate was described as “unknown.”
[452]                         
During his cross-examination, Mr. Berendson confirmed that he
owned no properties in Peru.  He was then confronted with a land registry
search from Peru[118],
with a search date of August 31, 2022, which predates Mr. Berendson’s sworn
financial statement by more than one year.  That search disclosed four
properties in Peru registered in Mr. Berendson’s name.  Mr. Berendson
acknowledged during the cross-examination that there were properties registered
in his name, but he claimed, without providing any proof, that when he left
Peru in 2020 that he “was not in Peruvian public records as owner of anything.”
 Mr. Berendson suggested that these property registrations may be related to
his father’s death.
[453]                         
Mr. Berendson spent approximately three years in Canada as a
visitor before deciding to make a refugee claim.  Mr. Berendson testified that
he now is able to work, but that he has not been working because it takes up
all his time representing himself in this current proceeding.
[454]                         
Mr. Berendson described that while in Canada he has engaged in
numerous community-based volunteer activities.  He testified about working with
newcomers in Canada; he gave lessons in basic computer skills; he volunteered
at a bicycle co-op and was a volunteer with the Salvation Army; he volunteered
also at a local sailing club including installing floating docks and repairing
inflatable boats.
[455]                         
When asked if he is planning to work, Mr. Berendson was quite
unequivocal, responding “absolutely, yes” adding that he was looking forward to
working although he was not sure what type of work he was planning to engage
in.
[456]                         
Mr. Berendson refused to produce a copy of his work permit.  He
told the applicant’s counsel during cross-examination that he refuses because “I
don’t feel safe with you.”
[457]                         
I accept Ms. Izquierdo’s evidence that she has not been receiving
child support.  Mr. Berendson claimed in his evidence that all child support is
under the jurisdiction of Peru.  While there is a child support order in Peru,
Mr. Berendson did not dispute that he is in arrears of child support.  His
financial statement shows a child support obligation of $200 per month with the
arrears totalling $4,800 which would represent two years of arrears as at the
date of the financial statement.  Mr. Berendson defended his current
non-payment of child support claiming that all of the child’s needs are being
taken care of because the child is a refugee in Canada.
[458]                         
Mr. Berendson, during cross-examination, explained that he has
been supporting himself while in Canada by getting help from friends, from
family, from “good Samaritans”, from good neighbours, “a little help” from
GoFundMe, and also he has borrowed money.  Mr. Berendson’s financial statement
shows $120,000 owing to his mother plus a debt of $15,000 owing to his witness,
Mr. Jansen, although Mr. Jansen testified that this debt now is in the range of
$40,000.
[459]                         
Ms. Izquierdo testified that she works on a part-time basis for a
company that provides cleaning and maintenance services.
[460]                         
Mr. Berendson was very deliberate in refusing to provide
information regarding his income for 2017-2019.  That information was relevant
because those were the last three years Mr. Berendson worked.  I do not believe
Mr. Berendson’s evidence that he could not remember his income during those
years.  This false evidence given by Mr. Berendson was a safe harbour for him,
because he knew there were no Peruvian tax returns filed as exhibits that could
be used to challenge his alleged lack of memory.  Mr. Berendson’s explanation
as to the requirements in Peru to file tax returns was nonsensical and was not
credible in the least.
[461]                         
Mr. Berendson’s financial statement was not accurate.  He failed
to disclose his property holdings and their value.  It was readily apparent
during Mr. Berendson’s evidence that he cared little, if at all, about
providing to the court a financial statement that sets out a true and accurate
picture of his real estate holdings.  I place no weight on Mr. Berendson’s
evidence alleging that nothing was registered in his name when he left Peru. 
In addition, prior to trial, Mr. Berendson was aware of those four properties
being registered in his name because he had received the applicant’s document
brief containing the property search and also a copy of the application which
referred to the properties registered in his name; yet Mr. Berendson made no
effort to serve and file a corrected financial statement as he was required to
do.
[462]                         
In Leitch v. Novac, 2020 ONCA 257 (Ont. C.A.), at para.
44, the Court of Appeal for Ontario, citing the Supreme Court of Canada in Leskun
v. Leskun, 2006 SCC 25 (S.C.C.), stated that nondisclosure is the cancer of
family law.
[463]                         
Mr. Berendson’s evidence suggesting that his current non-payment
of child support is to be excused because, allegedly, the child’s current
financial needs are being met by government or other sources, is a repudiation
of the law applicable to child support.  In Colucci v. Colucci, 2021 SCC
24 (S.C.C.), the Supreme Court of Canada provided guidance as to the principles
applicable to child support: (a) support is the right of the child and parents
have a financial obligation to their children arising at birth and continuing
after separation: para. 36; (b) in the “guidelines” era, a payor parent is always
under a free-standing obligation, independent of any court order, to pay child
support commensurate with income: para. 36; and (c) a child’s interest in a
fair standard of support commensurate with income is the core interest to which
all rules and principles must yield: para. 46.
[464]                         
Mr. Berendson’s evidence that the courts in Peru retain
jurisdiction regarding child support is misguided.  It is noted that although
there is an order for child support made in Peru, that its enforceability in
Ontario pursuant to the Interjurisdictional Support Orders Act, 2002, S.O.
2002, c. 13, specifically Part III, ss. 17-21 (registration and enforcement of
orders made outside of Ontario), is not available because Peru is not listed in
the regulations as a reciprocating jurisdiction.[119] 
Even if the Peruvian child support order was enforceable in Ontario, this would
not affect Ms. Izquierdo’s right to seek child support pursuant to the Family
Law Act.
[465]                         
The issue of child support pursuant to the Family Law Act
is properly before this court.  The issue is whether income should be imputed
to Mr. Berendson.  Ms. Izquierdo, in her written closing submissions at pages 3
and 42, requests that income be imputed to Mr. Berendson at least at the annual
minimum wage of $35,776 and commencing May 1, 2024.
[466]                         
Imputation of income is dealt with in s. 19(1)(a) of the Ontario
child support guidelines.
[467]                         
Drygala v. Pauli, 2002 CanLII 41868 (ON CA), 2002 CarswellOnt 3228 (Ont. C.A.), is a
leading case dealing with imputation of income.  The Court of Appeal for
Ontario held: that intentional under-employment and unemployment within the
meaning of s. 19(1)(a) require no specific intent to evade a child support
obligation before income can be imputed; that no bad faith is required in s.
19(1)(a); that the burden shifts to a parent to justify under-employment or
unemployment; and that the amount of income to be imputed as an exercise of the
court’s discretion must be grounded in the evidence: paras. 25, 26, 36, 38, 44.
[468]                         
Mr. Berendson is unemployed.  His explanation that he is unable
to work because of time devoted to this court case is not persuasive in the
least.  I find that Mr. Berendson is capable of full-time employment.  Mr.
Berendson’s education and work history demonstrate that he is talented and
employable.  Also, he claimed that he wants to work and that he is looking
forward to it.  Although Mr. Berendson has engaged in financial nondisclosure,
the evidentiary record does not permit this court to engage in speculation as
to what income he earned in Peru.  Any income imputation must be grounded in
the evidence (Drygala, para. 44).
[469]                         
I agree with the applicant that income should be imputed to Mr.
Berendson representing full-time minimum wage.  In Ontario, the minimum wage is
adjusted annually depending on the consumer price index on October 1 of each
year starting in 2022, and the general minimum wage rate in effect for Ontario
for October 1, 2023 and 2024 is respectively, $16.55 and $17.20.[120]
[470]                         
The general minimum wage effective October 1, 2024 results in an
income of $35,776[121]
which I round to $35,700.  The table amount of child support on that
income is $312 per month.  In the circumstances, it is not unreasonable to use
this amount starting August 1, 2024, even though the minimum wage until October
2024 was slightly lower.
[471]                         
The order below requires Mr. Berendson to pay child support in
the amount of $312 per month commencing August 1, 2024 and based on an annual
imputed income of $35,700.  Given Mr. Berendson’s lack of financial disclosure,
and the deficient evidentiary record regarding his income and property assets,
the order below includes a provision permitting Ms. Izquierdo to return to
court to change the amount of child support should further financial material
disclosure become available to her.
[472]                         
Furthermore, it is unacceptable that Mr. Berendson failed to
disclose and value his real property assets in Peru.  Mr. Berendson should not
be rewarded by permitting this state of nondisclosure to continue after this
trial particularly considering the unpaid costs orders made against Mr.
Berendson.  Accordingly, the order below requires Mr. Berendson to serve and
file an amended sworn financial statement that includes all real property
registered in his name in Peru, including the values of all those properties
supported by appraisals obtained at his expense.
[473]                         
The right to seek an order against a vexatious litigant is
contained in s. 140(1) of the Courts of Justice Act.  Section 140(1) was
amended[122]
effective October 15, 2024 after this trial concluded.  The new s. 140(1) is
reproduced below along with the new procedural provisions in s. 140(2), (2.1),
(2.2) and (2.3):
[474]                         
Compared to the previous s. 140, the changes to the current s.
140 are principally procedural rather than substantive.  For example, the
substantive criteria contained in the new s. 140(1) are similar to the old s.
140(1).[123]
[475]                         
While the legislation amending s. 140 did not contain a
transition provision, the Legislation Act, 2006[124],
provides that where an Act is amended, that proceedings under the
former Act shall be continued under the amended Act in conformity
with the amended Act as much as possible: s. 52, in particular see ss.
(1), (3) and (4).
[476]                         
In the present case, the new s. 140 applies.  However, the
discussion below and the result, on the facts of this case, would be unchanged
had the old s. 140 continued to apply.
[477]                         
Both parties referred to the decision of Broad J in a family law
case in Austin v. House, 2022 ONSC 2349 (Ont. S.C.J.), affirmed on
appeal[125],
where the court made an order against the father pursuant to s. 140 of the Courts
of Justice Act declaring him to be a vexatious litigant and prohibiting the
father from instituting further proceedings, in any court, without first
obtaining leave of a judge of the Superior Court of Justice.
[478]                         
I adopt the thorough summary of the law in relation to s. 140 as
discussed by Broad J. in Austin.  The purpose of a s. 140 order is
discussed in para. 7:
[479]                         
In making an order under s. 140 a cautious approach is required
and s. 140 should be interpreted narrowly in the clearest and most compelling
of cases.  This principle, including its application to family law matters is
discussed in Austin at paras. 8-10:
[480]                         
At paras. 9-10 above, the discussion in Austin focuses
more precisely on family law proceedings.  In family law matters, parenting
orders are always subject to a variation (or in Ontario, a motion to change) if
there has been a material change in circumstance.  When making a s. 140 order
although it is important to consider a parent’s right to bring a variation
proceeding, it is also important to consider that without some mechanisms to
prevent abuse, that a party could bring an endless stream of variation
applications.
[481]                         
As noted in Austin at para. 15, it is not necessary that
the proceedings be found to be vexatious; rather the wording in s. 140(1) is
disjunctive and is based on the institution of vexatious proceedings or conducting
a proceeding in a vexatious manner.  Hence, either is sufficient and both may
be present.
[482]                         
The necessity to protect scarce judicial resources from being
monopolized by vexatious litigants is an appropriate factor to consider: Austin,
at para. 14.
[483]                         
A litigant’s conduct both in and out of court including
extrajudicial proceedings, can be considered when making an order under s. 140:
Bishop v. Bishop, 2011 ONCA 211 (CanLII), 2011 ONCA, page 211 (Ont. C.A.), at paras. 8-9.
[484]                         
For reasons set out below, I find that the applicant’s request
for an order pursuant to s. 140 is justified.
[485]                         
Mr. Berendson understandably commenced the Hague
application proceeding in circumstances, where from his perspective, Mr.
Izquierdo had removed the child from Peru in contravention of a Peruvian court
order.  Although Mr. Berendson’s appeal was dismissed, the dismissal was
without costs.[126] 
However, Mr. Berendson’s commencement of a second Hague application is a
proceeding that is proper to consider in relation to s. 140.
[486]                         
An important focus of the s. 140 analysis is the evidentiary
record in this trial, and Mr. Berendson’s behaviour during the trial,
demonstrating that Mr. Berendson has conducted a proceeding in a “vexatious
manner.”  This analysis includes also Mr. Berendson’s out-of-court conduct
including his behaviour in Peru.
[487]                         
The request for a s. 140 order is justified on grounds including
the following:
[488]                         
The foregoing demonstrates that Mr. Berendson’s second Hague
application was a vexatious proceeding, and that Mr. Berendson has conducted
the current proceeding in a vexatious manner.  It is not difficult to envision Mr.
Berendson instituting further court proceedings against Ms. Izquierdo,
including a motion to change, considering especially that Mr. Berendson still
continues to litigate parenting issues in the Peruvian courts.
[489]                         
This trial was unnecessarily lengthy; while some responsibility lies
with Ms. Izquierdo, much of the undue length of this trial is attributable to
Mr. Berendson’s behaviour.
[490]                         
Similar to the findings made by Broad J. in Austin, at
para. 14, I find that a s. 140 order is appropriate to protect Ms. Izquierdo
from further harassment, and also to protect scarce judicial resources from being
needlessly monopolized by Mr. Berendson.  I adopt Broad J.’s observation in
para. 14 that a s. 140 order will not prevent Mr. Berendson from having access
to the court; he will be required just to obtain leave to bring a further
proceeding.
[491]                         
In the present case, I decline to limit the s. 140 order to a
potential motion to change proceeding.  Such a term will undermine the
effectiveness of the order.
[492]                         
Early in this trial, the court raised with counsel and the
parties that Mr. Berendson had been requesting copies of the digital audio
recordings of this trial.  After hearing submissions, an order[128]
was made prohibiting release to anyone of copies of the digital audio
recordings, pending written reasons. The written reasons were subsequently
released[129]
and provided that no copies of the digital audio recordings of this trial
should be released to anyone, and permitting the parties and the OCL to make
submissions at the end of this trial whether the order should continue.
[493]                         
Mr. Berendson’s use of social media has been discussed in detail
in these reasons, including as noted earlier, Mr. Berendson’s failure to comply
with the social media order.  Audio recordings in digital format can be
disseminated easily on social media.
[494]                         
Although the request form for the digital audio recordings
includes an agreement to be signed by the person requesting the recording not
to publicize, broadcast or disseminate the recording in any way, or copy, save
or download the recording, it is not possible to rely on Mr. Berendson to
comply with such an agreement given his propensity in using social media and
his failure to comply with the social media order.
[495]                         
It is in the interests of justice, and also in the child’s best
interests, to prohibit the release of the digital audio recordings of this
trial to anyone, as reflected in the order below.
[496]                         
In accordance with the foregoing reasons, a final order shall
issue as follows: